Title
Review for Vita č bella, La (1997)
Number of Reviews
40

Author
Fontaine Lien
"In the game we are all players.  It's all organized."
It's true for me (and for many other critics) that the less I have to
say about a movie, the better it is.   One thing I'll have to say, though, is
this movie didn't wasn't as good as I expected it to be; maybe I've heard
too many good things about this movie beforehand.  In it, we find
something beautiful, exotic, sad; the same something we find in every
movie that features another tongue and foreign soil.  The distinct, anti-
Hollywood glamour movie that almost inevitably receives a nod for
Outstanding Foreign Movie at the Oscars. I'm not trying to downplay the
quality of this film; it's just that it seems we're all too ready to embrace
these type of movies these days just because of what they are.  It's
because of this reason that I label "Life is Beautiful" as something less
than "excellent."
That aside, "Life" had all the makings of a good anti-Holocaust movie.  The
bittersweet memories are there, the horror is there, the pathos is there. 
Roberto Benigni's character is carefree, reckless, mischievous, yet good
natured and every bit the loving father and husband.  Benigni's
performance is stellar, and it's the gradual destruction of this
uninhibited, innocent soul that is at the core of the movie's message.  He
did everything he could to save his family, he laughed in the face of death
and persecution, but fate destroyed him anyway.  How cruel is destiny,
how ruthless the German Nazi's, that even a man of such tenacity can be
broken?  Because we've gotten to know this adorable family so well--
from the anecdotes of the courtship and the education of the little boy
Joshua which provide some extremely funny moments--the deaths seem
all the more tragic, the survival all the more bittersweet.  
It's equally marvelous that we not only see the story of this family, we
see aspects of each part of the human spectrum, each part that's part of
what makes life "beautiful," through good times, bad times, and war
times.  Suffice to say that our hero did not die in vain.  

Author
Ross Anthony
Heck, I finally went to see this one. And now that I have, I recommend you
do.
Guido is a happy go lucky Jewish-Italian gentleman with the lovable ability
to make any event, no matter how big or small, work in his favor and lift
the spirits of all "good-hearted" passers-by to boot. Unfortunately, Guido
is living in Italy at a tragic time in world history. His sparkling ability
is put to the darkest of tests when he and his family are shipped off to
Nazi concentration camps in Germany.
This script is so smooth. There's nothing extraneous. It's perfectly focused
and the timing of events (especially in the first half) is smashing. Benigni
brilliantly spectacles the glorious to nauseating extremes the gift of life
affords us ... while encouraging our participation in the former.
Writer/Director/Actor: Roberto Benigni
Produced by Elda Ferri, Gianluigi Braschi and distributed by Miramax.
Rated PG-13.
Grade..........................A
--
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Edwin Jahiel
LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL  (LA VITA E BELLA) (Italy, 1997) *** 1/2 Directed by
Roberto Benigni.Written by Vincenzo Cerami and Benigni.Photography, Tonino
Delli Colli. Editing, Simona Paggi. Music,Nicola Piovani; Production
design, Danilo Donati.Produced by Elda Ferri and Gianluigi Braschi. Cast
Roberto Benigni (Guido), Nicoletta Braschi (Dora), Giorgio Cantarini
(Giosue), Giustino Durano (Uncle), Sergio Bustric (Ferruccio), Marisa
Paredes (Dora's mother), Horst Buchholz (Dr.Lessing), et al. A Miramax
release.  In Italian. 122 minutes.PG-13.
Ever since the birth of cinema, like the stock market, the movie production
of just about all nations has had its ups and downs, its periods of glory,
its descents to Purgatory. Today, many a national cinema is in crisis, but
then even among those countries, gems are produced.
Italian film, it's been repeatedly claimed, mostly by specialists, is in
the doldrums these days. I disagree. Yes, big names such as Rossellini, De
Sica, Fellini and such are no more.  Antonioni is alive but seriously
un-well. Scola is alive and well and active, but his films don't get the
distribution they once had, notably in the U.S.A where he's almost an
unknown now. Fiftyish  Bertolucci is under-represented; Pupi Avati is not
even listed in most general reference works. Movies by the still younger,
most talented mavericks (Moretti, Nichetti, Salvatore, many others) are
minimally screened.
Yet, if for nothing else, Italian cinema today should be world-famous for
its wit and sense of the comic, the best around. A case in point is Life is
Beautiful, by and with that arch-clown, the screwball comic Roberto
Benigni. Mercifully, the Grand Jury Prize at the 1998 Cannes Festival. It
has also received seven Academy Awards nominations, including both Best
Film and Best Foreign Film - something that has not happened since 1969,
with Costa-Gavras's political thriller Z.
LIB (Life is Beautiful) has two halves. The first  is a tornado of fast
talk, lighting-quick acts, broad gestures, and inventions as hilarious as
anything I can remember.The audience is kept in stitches.
Benigni plays Guido who, in 1938 Fascist Italy, comes to Tuscan town of
Arezzo (under 100,000 pop.) where he dreams of having his own bookstore. At
first he flirts with pretty schoolteacher Dora (the quietly luminous
Nicoletta Braschi, Benigni's wife), as he does with all  the girls. But
before you can say "giovinezza" this becomes love and courtship, in
entirely original, hilarious ways.
Simultaneously, Guido goes through other, wonderfully comical routines as he
waits on tables at the Grand Hotel where his nice uncle, the Maitre D, has
hired him. Guido also impersonates people, and is not stingy with overt or
implied critiques of the Fascist regime, its bureaucracy, its racism, its
go-getters, its delusions of grandeur.
He then "abducts" a willing Dora on the very day of her official (and arranged)
engagement to a stuffy government flunky. If you're not in stitches, have
your doctor check you funny bone. Guido and Dora marry right away.
It's all  slapstick fantasy, of course, as much as any Marx Brothers film.
Almost nothing of what happens could happen in reality, yet the
fancifulness is rooted in reality. Blithe Guido is so lavish with his
unorthodox comments and, like many Italians, so full of casual references
to the Virgin Mary and to saints, that you do not suspect that he is a Jew.
Until, that is, his uncle's horse (sic) is painted green by Fascists, with
"Jewish Horse" written on it. But even so, little is made of this.
The first half is as Italian as they make them, with typical volubility,
zesr for life and sense of the absurd. It is not for nothing that this is
the land of the Commedia dell' Arte and of grand, lyrical opera.
Cut to five years later. The couple have a bookstore and a little boy. The
government targets Jews and Jewish businesses. The Nazis deport father and
son to a concentration camp  Dora (a gentile) forces her way into the
deportation train. To protect the youngster, Guido fabricates an elaborate
charade to make him believe that all this is just one big game.
The break in tone is jolting. From the laughter of Part One we are
transported to the sadness of  Part Two, which is heart-rending. In Italy,
the film swept the equivalent of Oscars (7 wins) and broke all attendance
records. But there were some strong objections to Benigni for "trivializing
the Holocaust." "Not so," he fought back  He had submitted his script to
major Jewish organizations which gave it their go-ahead and later even
defended the finished film. The Mayor of Jerusalem published praises.
Following Cannes, Benigni was a guest of honor at the Jerusalem Film
Festival where he won the first prize for a Jewish-themed work, Between the
movie's release in Italy and Cannes, he did make some cuts, said to be more
a matter of length than of content, although I suspect that the slightly
reduced version may be the cause of some continuity gaps and "collapsed"
time.
The controversy has continued. The reception of the film by the public has
been very good, by critics too, even though nay-sayers do remain who think
it is in poor taste. The inescapable fact is that the uneasy mixture does
come as a shock. It is a "first," a daring experiment that gambles not on
comedy but on Guido's shenanigans --his lies to his son -- within a death
camp. Still,  Part Two, while based on the Nazis' inexplicable monstrosity,
is also very much of a fantasy, a kind of landscape in the mind that does
not reproduce, as in a documentary, the horror of it all. In a sense, it is
somewhat like some shielded child's imagination. And its engine is not
reality but the limitless love of a father for his son.
By a strange coincidence, in both this film and Central Station, its rival
at the Oscars, the woman and the child are called Doris and Joshua.
At the Cannes Festival, the prize ceremony is short (around 30 minutes) and
dull. But for the first time in memory it was hugely livened up by Benigni.
He appeared on the stage to receive his award (the runner-up Grand Jury
Prize), jumping, hollering, radiant with joy ... and pretending he had
received the topmost award, the Palme d'Or . Frantically, like someone who
has met his savior, he threw himself prone at the feet of Jury President
Martin Scorsese who was so taken aback that he lost his ever-solemn
composure. The irrepressible Benigni went on to more profuse, comical
expressions of happiness and gratitude.
" Le mauvais gout mene au crime" (Stendhal)
Edwin Jahiel's movie reviews are at http://www.prairienet.org/ejahiel

Author
John Haywood
     The year before last was a heck of a year if you like good films.
Never mind "Titanic;" I thought it was good, but way over-hyped.  "Good Will
Hunting," "Contact," and "Seven Years in Tibet" were better; on a technical
par with "Titanic," but more interesting.  I thought "Gattaca," a very well
made science-fiction film that questions what impact genetic engineering
will have on our lives, was easily the best film of that year.  Of course, I
didn't
know "Life Is Beautiful" was being shown in Italy.
     Guido Orefice is the type of man who can laugh at anything.  If he
weren't, he might not be able to survive--for he's Jewish and lives in
fascist Italy.  His jolly attitude helps him woo Dora (Nicoletta Braschi)
away from the bureaucrat she's engaged to (the man who denied him a permit
to open a bookstore, no less).  The question ultimately comes down to
whether his happy demeanor is enough to carry him, Dora, and their young son
Joshua
(Giorgio Cantarini) through the horrors of World War II.
     "Life Is Beautiful" is wonderfully written.  When it tries to be funny,
it is hilarious.  In one very pointed scene, Guido, hoping to find someone
who opposes the fascists, quietly asks
another man what his politics are--before the question even registers in the
man's
head, he addresses his children by name: Benito and Adolpho.  Still, not
everything works against Guido; the scene where he finally wins over Dora is
absolutely perfect.  All this comedy works very much in the film's favor.  I
have no qualms about saying "Life
Is Beautiful" is better than "Schindler's List;" and it boils down to the
comedy.  Guido's clownish nature makes it even harder to watch what happens
to him in the concentration camp--but by the same token. it gives him a
defiant air that's very satisfying, and helps relieve the oppressiveness of
the totalitarian state that looms over everyone in the film.
     Just watching the film, you can tell that it was a labor of love for
the actors.  Two stand out in my mind: the first is Giorgio Cantarini, who
plays Joshua.  Though he's a little old
for the very early scenes, he carries off the later scenes beautifully--it's
really hard to believe so young a child can act so effectively.  Roberto
Benigni, however, is the true creative genius who pulls the film together.
In addition to his masterful work co-writing and
directing "Life is Beautiful," he also stars in it; he won my heart within
his first minute on screen.
     If "Life Is Beautiful" has a weakness, it's the translation.  There
were several places where the subtitles seemed a great deal shorter than the
spoken lines--and one where I thought I caught a name that didn't make it
into the subtitle.  Despite this problem, the subtitles are preferable to a
dubbing.  Beyond the traditional arguments regarding the value of hearing
the original actors--which I'd say apply more to "Life Is Beautiful" than
any
other foreign film I've seen--there would be a thorny translation problem
with the fact that some minor characters SPEAK English or German--languages
not understood by the characters they're addressing; it would become
confusing if the other characters spoke English instead of Italian--as would
happen if the film were dubbed.
     The PG-13 rating seems strong for "Life is Beautiful."  The main basis
is the strong thematic content relating to the holocaust.  The worst
violence is all off screen--in a way, it's more jarring than most films'
depictions on screen; the big exception is a scene involving a stack of
corpses.  I didn't catch any nudity or coarse language--though I don't speak
Italian, so the latter may have been lost in translation (but I doubt it).
The real problem for children
is they'll probably will lose patience with the subtitles.  That's a shame,
since all else being equal, I'd say the film would be a good family film:
the film's moving depiction of some of the worst events in history, and the
depiction of Guido and Dora's great--even heroic--love for each other and
their son, both weigh heavily in its favor.
     Still, calling it a family film doesn't do "Life Is Beautiful" justice.
One often thinks of family films as bland.  "Life is Beautiful" will make
you laugh plenty, cry some, and
think.  It's uplifting, charming, and creative.  I honestly can't think of a
word against it.
Title: "Life Is Beautiful"/"La Vita č Bella"
Release date: 1997 (Italy)/1998 (USA)   MPAA rating: PG-13
Overall rating: *****                   Aprox. run time: 116 min.
Director: Roberto Benigni
Writers: Vincenzo Cerami, Roberto Benigni
Stars: Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio Cantarini
Explanation of ratings:
***** If you had to pay $100 to see it, it'd still be worth it.
**** Buy the video for $20.
*** Probably worth $6.50 for the ticket--worth $1.50 to rent.
** Not even worth the time to see it--let alone the money.
* Don't see it unless someone pays you at least $50 to sit through it.
Visit the Reviews by John website:
http://www.geocities.com/reviewsbyjohn/
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Mansion/7045/

This service provided through Yahoo! and AT&T e-mail accounts.  The
Yahoo.com and att.net domain names are not meant to imply any form of
support, sponsorship, or official sanction by Yahoo! Inc. or AT&T
Inc.
The views expressed are solely those of the author.
Copyright Š 1999, 2000 by John Haywood. Permission is hereby granted to
forward this message unedited and in its entirety.

Author
Jerry Saravia
Roberto Benigni is the modern-day Chaplin - quixotic, energetic and clownish.
He's always surrounded by societal misfits and higher-ups who want no part of
him, yet Benigni always finds a way to immerse himself in their company and
conform to society's expectations, all the while still remaining buffoonish.
"Life is Beautiful" is his latest film as writer-director, but this time he's
confronted by a deeper reality - the Holocaust. 
Benigni stars as Guido, a Jewish-Italian buffoon who continually runs into a
pretty schoolteacher (Nicoletta Braschi), whom he desperately longs for. The
first time, he confronts her at a farm where he makes off with some eggs. Then
he makes a merry trip to one of the picturesque villages of Tuscany, seeking
employment as a waiter and living with his uncle. 
Of course, he keeps running into the schoolteacher, who admires his
persistence. In one incredibly riotous scene, Guido impersonates an official
who is to lecture a class about races. Guido makes such a spectacle of himself
by undressing in front of the class and making observations about racism that
practically had me falling out of my seat laughing. Guido finally wins the
teacher's heart, and they get married, have a son, and run their own bookstore.
During the last hour of the film, Guido and his son are captured by the Nazis
and taken to a concentration camp. It is here where Guido tries to convince his
son that it is all a game, a contest played by military-style officials where
the grand prize is a real tank! 
The first hour of "Life is Beautiful" is sweet and comical, among Benigni's
finest moments on screen. It is on par with the rampant silliness of "Johnny
Stecchino." The second half is not as ingenious, and I think mainly because
Benigni chose a subject that is difficult to take on any comic level. 
The notion is that Guido tries to shelter his son from the horrors of the Nazi
death camps by accentuating that it is all a game, a farce that can be reckoned
with. In doing so, Benigni has removed all the inhumanity and horror from the
Holocaust - he turns it into another one of Guido's comical pranks. 
Some of it is successful - I like the scene where Guido serves as translator
for a German commandant who explains what the duties of the prisoners are in
the camps. There is also a brief moment where Guido sees a mountainous hill of
corpses, all photographed as if they were a glass painting. 
By the end of the film, though, the theme of survival and sacrifice is lost
when we don't really see what was lost or gained from the experience. It
doesn't help that the camps and their surroundings are photographed in the same
colorful, picturesque quality as the Tuscan village scenes. 
"Life is Beautiful" is a paradox in theory - it presents the Holocaust as a
fairytale, and expects us to laugh along with Guido. If we had seen it from
Guido's son's point-of-view, the comical scenes would have worked better. His
son surely would have had his own wild-eyed view of one of the century's
greatest atrocities. And the last scene of the American tank arriving at the
camps reeks of Spielbergian sentiment. 
In general, "Life is Beautiful" does so many things right, and is often
wonderful and touching. Benigni is one of the few uncommonly pleasurable actors
in the movies today, and he has agreeable chemistry with his real-life wife
Braschi ("Down By Law"). It was a mistake, though, to transcend the meaning of
the Holocaust by turning it into a farce. 
The movie doesn't have the atmosphere or the sardonic pull of the similar Lina
Wertmuller classic, "Seven Beauties," which accepted the reality of the war and
had the superb comic actor Giancarlo Giannini at its center, saving his own
life by sleeping with the commandant. Sure, we all make sacrifices, but
sometimes we need to see what we're making them for. 
For more movie reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or comments at jerry@movieluver.com or
at Faust667@aol.com

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio Cantarini, Sergio
Bustric, Horst Buchholz.
Screenplay: Robert Benigni and Vincenzo Cerami.
Producers: Elda Ferri and Gianluigi Braschi.
Director: Roberto Benigni
Don't let the following quirks of this review, fool you into believing
that this movie is anything short of an ultimate labour of love. But one
can see the humour of Roberto Benigni when you see that 
Life is beautiful, even though I'm a short, ugly looking man with an
obnoxious laugh. Life is beautiful even though I haven't amounted to
much in life, except working out the finer intricacies of waitering. I'm
a lucky sort of a guy, especially when a beautiful woman strips away my
venner of superficiality to find a new age,sensitive guy with the
biggest heart in the entire world underneath - Life is Beautiful! I'm a
Jew, but Life can still be beautiful. The Nazis put me in a
concentration camp, but Life is still beautiful. I love my son very much
and that's what matters, and that's what makes Life beautiful. My
ability to entertain somehow convinces my son that living in a
concentration camp is somewhat beautiful? I get shot for my efforts and
the woman I love, but hey that's life and that's still a beautiful thing
- so by Jove don't give me any crap about it!
By far the movie with the biggest heart this decade and well deserves
every nomination and award that it has achieved. Well done, there should
be more film directors and actors like you Roberto Benigni.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Life Is Beautiful (1997)
(La Vita č bella)
Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giustino Durano, Sergio Bini 
Bustric, Marisa Paredes, Horst Buchholz, Lidia Alfonsi, Giuliana 
Lojodice, Giorgio Cantarini, Amerigo Fontani, Pietro De Silva, 
Francesco Guzzo, Raffaella Lebboroni, Aaron Craig. Screenplay by 
Roberto Benigni and Vincenzo Cerami. Directed by Roberto Benigni. 114 
minutes.
Rated PG-13, 4 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-
ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests 
to pbbp24a@prodigy.com
Grand Prix winner at the 1998 Cannes Film Festival, "Life Is 
Beautiful" offers ample rewards to those viewers willing to submit to 
the peculiar vision of writer, director and star Roberto Benigni. The 
Italian artist has crafted an often lyrical light romance that 
abruptly transforms into a deeply moving tale of survival. Despite 
the film's radical shift in tone, Benigni's message never wavers: 
life is beautiful if you make it so. While we cannot always control 
the circumstances around us, we can govern our individual responses. 
Each person has the capacity to create his or her own internal 
reality. It's just a matter of willpower.
The film, in Italian with English subtitles, begins as a romantic 
farce. Guido (Benigni) is a Jewish drifter who stumbles through 1939 
Fascist Italy, using his wits and clownish charm to get by. When told 
of a philosopher's belief in the strength of human will, Guido takes 
the remarks literally and begins to practice "willing" things to 
happen. In short order, he successfully courts the beautiful Dora 
(Nicoletta Braschi, Benigni's real-life spouse) and builds a thriving 
business and happy life for his family, blissfully ignoring the 
growing anti-Semitism around them.
Then in 1945, the final days of World War II, authorities take Guido 
and his five-year-old son Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini) into custody, 
herding them onto a train bound for a concentration camp. When Dora 
hears the news, she races to the train station and insists that she 
be put onboard as well. Even though she is not Jewish, Dora refuses 
to leave her family. 
At the camp, Guido concocts a story to shield his son from the 
horrific reality around them. He tells Giosue that it's all an 
elaborate game. The goal is to accumulate 1000 points. Giosue's eyes 
widen as he hears of the prize; a real tank, ever so much better than 
the toy he used to play with. The child listens intently as his 
father explains the mechanics of the game. The men in uniform will 
pretend to be very mean. The child must hide when his father 
instructs him to do so, and never complain about the lack of food or 
harsh conditions, because complainers will be disqualified and sent 
home. As their existence grows increasingly difficult, Guido 
encourages his son to take heart, because more and more people are 
dropping out and they are growing much closer to winning the game.
While the constant threat of death hovers in the air, Benigni avoids 
explicit imagery. ''As a comedian,'' he told the L.A. Times, ''I 
couldn't do like Spielberg with 'Schindler's List' and show the 
violence directly. It's not my style. My style is to evoke and let 
people use their imaginations. Sometimes the horror can be even more 
powerful that way.'' 
The idea for the story sprang from Benigni's childhood. His father, a 
soldier imprisoned for two years in a German labor camp, was obsessed 
by his memories of the ordeal and frequently told his children about 
the nightmarish camp. Eventually, his wife convinced him that he was 
scaring the children, so he started telling the tales in a lighter 
way. ''He found funny things to say, even when dealing with these 
painful circumstances,'' said Benigni. ''The way he was telling the 
stories is exactly what I have done in my story.'' 
The film's title came from Russian revolutionary Leon Trotsky, who 
wrote that he believed ''life is beautiful,'' even as he sat trapped 
in a bunker, waiting for Stalin's agents to assassinate him. Benigni 
found the statement profound, saying ''I fell in love with this 
simple phrase, 'Life is beautiful.' Even with darkness all around us, 
we can still find beauty. That is true strength.''
Benigni's film is beautiful as well, although the going is often 
difficult. While the first half of the story has a certain charm, the 
pratfall comedy is more ingenious than funny, and Benigni's mugging 
gets old fast. The performer has been called the Robin Williams of 
Italy, and, like Williams, his comedic grandstanding frequently 
becomes overbearing. Thankfully, the lyricism of the story outweighs 
his lack of subtlety.
Nicoletta Braschi is adequate as Dora, although she lacks the depth 
necessary to convincingly express the emotions beneath her 
character's brave actions. As Giosue, young Giorgio Cantarini is a 
real charmer, interacting flawlessly with Benigni. When he questions 
his father's story, fearfully stating ''A man was crying. He said 
they make buttons and soap out of us,'' the effect is devastating. 
Of the supporting cast, Horst Buchholz is memorable as a riddle-
obsessed German doctor, providing one of the film's most poignant 
moments late in the story; Giustino Durano is haunting as Guido's 
uncle, and Aaron Craig does America proud in a brief appearance as a 
benevolent U.S. soldier.
It's not easy to sit through ''Life Is Beautiful.'' Between Benigni's 
mugging, the often flat comedy, and the structure of the piece, it's 
actually quite hard. But those up to challenge will receive ample 
dividends. Benigni's unique concept and wonderful message about the 
human spirit makes this awkward, ungainly film well worth the trouble.

Author
John Smythe
A review from the Stockholm Film Review 
http://www.fortunecity.com/lavendar/heat/435/
Roberto Benigni's "Life is Beautiful" (La vita č bella) is a modern 
fairy tale, as touching and as relevant as the tales collected by the 
Brothers Grimm to entertain, enchant and ,yes, to scare children over 
150 years ago. Like many such tales (such as Snow White) this 
storyteller is not afraid to explore the dark side of humanity in order 
to highlight the power of good. And, in this century, what could be much 
darker than the concentration camps of World War 2, and the attempted 
extermination of entire peoples on the basis of alleged 'impurities' ?
The film begins on a truly whimsical note, with two young men, Guido 
Orifice (Roberto Benigni) and Ferruccio Orefice (Sergio Bini Bustric) 
motoring through picturesque sun-drenched countryside on their way to an 
Italian city to join their uncle and work with him. The car breaks down, 
and while Ferruccio attempts repairs, Guido, a happy-go-lucky but 
intelligent sort, wanders to a nearby farm. There, a beautiful woman, 
Dora, (Nicoletta Braschi) falls out of a hayloft, into Guido's arms. He 
is immediately smitten, though she is merely amused by his antics as he 
tries to impress her.
When the two men reach the city, Guido's plan to open a bookstore are 
scuppered by the inadvertent (though comical) upset he causes to the 
local councillor whose permission is required. However, he meets Dora (a 
schoolteacher) several more times, though each time it is in most 
unexpected manner. He woos her, and she seems interested. Unfortunately, 
she is to be married to the same arrogant councillor whose wrath Guido 
has already incurred. However, in a grand and magical sequence, Guido 
finally wins the hand of his princess, the name he has given her from 
their first meeting.
The challenge of Benigni's work is that it binds two diametrically 
opposed subjects in a balanced and entertaining way. His tale of a 'love 
that was meant to be' is told engagingly and whimsically in the first 
part of the movie. The second part of the movie delves into horror and 
tragedy which test the limits and meaning of such love (indeed any 
love). The second half of the movie is set in a concentration camp, five 
years later. Guido, Dora (now his wife) and their son Joshua have been 
sent there along with their uncle, (Giustino Durano). Dora is separated 
from the others, and Guido tells Joshua that their imprisonment is 
really a game, and that the winner of the game will win a real tank 
(Joshua's unfulfilled birthday wish). Thus, the guards are all part of 
the game, and certain rules must be observed in order to gain enough 
points to win. 
The first half of the movie, set in pre-war Italy, sets the tone for the 
events to follow by contrasting the evolving relationship between Guido 
and Dora, with the slow slide of Italy into the Nazis' Final Solution. 
When Guido is working as a waiter (and still trying to win Dora) , he 
encounters a school inspector who will visit her school. Guido turns up 
early, posing as the inspector, only to find out that the inspector was 
to deliver a race superiority lecture to the pupils. Guido invents a 
funny and satirical alternative. Of course, we, the audience, cannot 
fail to see the irony of a bunch of dark-eyed and sallow-skinned five 
year olds receiving a lecture on the superiority of the blue-eyed, blond 
Aryan nation.
When the teachers in the school complain that mathematical problems such 
as "What is the total cost to the state if the cost of each lunatic is 
four crowns and each cripple five, and there are 20, 000 in total" are 
being asked of the pupils, it is not because the questions are sinister 
and tasteless, but because the multiplication is too difficult for five 
year olds. The teachers rue that" it is not too hard for a German five 
year old". 
The second half of the movie focuses on the characters rather than the 
horror that confronts them. Guido is forced to work in the ironworks at 
the camp knowing that if he can no longer work, he will die. Even though 
he is weak and dreadfully tired after every day, he keeps a cheery face 
for Joshua so that the facade of the game never drops. This sometimes 
requires him to take extreme risks but Guido never hesitates. His love 
for his son is complete. In the same way, Dora had the option of evading 
the camp but chose to be with her family, albeit remotely. The central 
characters never allows their humanity to be overwhelmed by the events 
and the callous indifference shown to them by their captors. When 
Guido's uncle (Giustino Durano) is being led to the 'showers', a female 
guard stumbles and he helps her. He retains his dignity despite knowing 
his fate.
The movie has been criticised for trivialising the Holocaust; unfairly 
in my opinion. It is true that certain events in the movie are a little 
unrealistic. Perhaps Guido would not have escaped punishment for some of 
his antics in a real camp. But the appalling nature of the camps is 
never denied - merely pointed up in a subtle way. Joshua complains that 
he cannot find any of the other children competing for the prize. Guido 
tells him that they are better at hiding than Joshua, and only the child 
best at hiding will win. Guido knows the real reason for the lack of 
children is because they were all gassed once they arrived.
Guido meets an old friend in the camp - a Dr. Lessing (Horst Buchholz, 
reunited with Benigni from Faraway, So Close) whom Guido used to pit his 
wits against in games of riddles. Now Dr. Lessing decides who is fit to 
work and who must be sent to the 'showers' (fit to die, so to speak). 
Begnini's performance is central to the success of the movie, and his 
screen-time with his son Joshua (Giorgio Cantarini) is convincing and 
affectionate. Funnily enough, the weakest part of the story is why Dora 
and Guido get together (Braschi is Benigni's real-life wife). Yes, it is 
meant to be a tribute to the power of serendipity and fate. But, while 
we know that Guido is a good person, all we know of Dora is her beauty 
(which is a prerequisite for a princess in a fairy tale, I suppose), and 
that she hates her fiancée. Buchholz and Durano are also quietly 
effective as the doctor and the uncle respectively, using the slightest 
of expressions and gestures to convey a world of emotion and meaning.
Benigni's (who is director and co-writer of the film) use of a 
concentration camp as a backdrop to his story is a brave and inspired 
move. Though comparisons with Spielberg's Schindler's List are 
understandable, Life is Beautiful is closer to Charlie Chaplin's The 
Great Dictator. Both Chaplin and Benigni use the plight of 'the common 
man' to underline the effects of fascism. However, Chaplin resorted to 
rather obvious sentimentality which he contrasted with a heavy-handed 
satirical portrayal of Hitler. Benigni does not need to put horns or 
tails on his 'bad guys'. Their events and deeds speak of their character 
loud and clear. (To be fair to Chaplin, he did not have the benefit of 
hindsight). At a time when similar atrocities are still taking place in 
an area only a few hours flight from most cities in Europe, it is also a 
timely reminder of the consequences of such madness. This is a truly 
adult fairly tale; triumphant, poignant, timeless and one which will 
linger long in the minds of those who see it, and creating memories that 
one will wish to revisit time and time again.


Author
Seth Bookey
Review of La Vita E Bello (1997, a/k/a Life Is Beautiful, in Italian with
English subtitles)
Seen on 2 January 1999 by myself at the Paris for $8.75
There's a limit to which an audience that knows better can be asked to
suspend their disbelief, and *La Vita E Bello* crosses that line when it
uses the Holocaust more than it respects it.
The movie has two clear halves; the first part is in Arezzo, 1939, and the
second is in a concentration/death camp run by the Germans. The first half
is far better than the second, but is essential in establishing the
motivation for Guido Orefice (Roberto Benigni). As a whole, it's
disappointing--and insulting--despite many enjoyable and even hilarious
moments.
Roberto Benigni is best known to American audiences from *Son of the Pink
Panther* and as the Roman cabbie in *Night on Earth*, a manic physical
actor with many traditional comic talents that lend themselves to farces.
Here, Benigni is both co-author and director, and hand-tailored a role for
himself in which he gets to flex all those comic muscles, everything from
broad winks to careening down a hill in a car with no brakes. (In that
latter scene, which opens the movie, he is mistaken for the King of Italy;
a way of recognizing himself as the King of Italian Comedy, that country's
most recognizable movie export these days).
So you wonder, how does all this fit into the context of a Nazi death
camp? The answer: It doesn't.
The first half of the movie is a courtship, of Guido for Dora (Nicoletta
Braschi, Benigni's wife), and of Benigni of the audience. Guido is a
perpetual clown, somehow eluding capture from the Fascists he satirizes
and creating minor miracles by manipulating coincidence. That he is Jewish
in a time (1939) when Mussolini has passed laws against Jewish interaction
with Italians is minimized. His uncle is roughed up periodically, and
Guido accepts the old man's idea that sometimes "silence is the most
powerful cry." (NOTE: *The Garden of Finzi-Continis* shows, realistically,
the social and political isolation of Italian Jewry that led to their
ultimate round-up after being successfully demoralized.) But the courtship
works: Dora marries Guido and they produce a son.
It also works in that Benigni's comic charms win over the audience as he
prances in lush white marble restaurants and among flag-waving patriots.
He is part-Chaplin and part-Marx Brothers. Especially funny are the scenes
in which he plays a shell game with a local fascist's hat--it's right out
of Harpo and Chico. (The man's squabbling children are Benito and Adolfo).
In fact, the first half of the movie comes close to the great farces of
the 1930s.
However, when the family is sent to a death camp, *the antics continue*,
which surely would have resulted in instant death. But Guido keeps up the
pretense for the sake of his son Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini); he creates an
elaborate game that teaches his son that hiding is essential so they can
gain 1000 points and win a tank.
No matter how knowing and wise the son is, Guido explains away everything
as "someone's lying to you" when he's asked if it's true that they will be
turned into buttons and soap. 
Playing the fool is often a matter of survival (who could forget *I,
Claudius*), but set against the backdrop of genocide, this device is
insulting to anyone who knows even the basics about the Holocaust. Here,
the manipulation of coincidence is unbelievable. The likelihood that a man
of no matter how much he might be driven by love of his son, wanting to
ensure his survival, would have been rapidly demoralized and broken by the
backbreaking physical labor, disease, killing, torture and atrocity at the
camp. Ignored are *all* the features we know about the camps; the
ever-watchful guards, their sadistic behavior; the omnipresent stench of
death. It is not clear how long they are in the camp, but little Giosue is
always neat and clean; surely in real life, he would be lice-ridden and
emaciated. That Guido's clowning is barely affected by the sight of a pile
of hundreds of corpses is just obscene.
The idea that Guido has made the "ultimate sacrifice" is soft and fuzzy,
but in reality, he is teaching his son to hide behind a clown facade, and
avoid what is plainly obvious. This goes counter to the countless examples
of sacrifice and martyrdom in the real survival stories.
Perhaps *Life Is Beautiful* would have been better if Benigni had drawn
upon the real stories of Italian Jews who eluded the Nazis with the help
of their Christian neighbors; and Giosue could have learned some of the
beauty of life from the example of righteous gentiles, who perhaps could
have been brought into the games to allay the boy's fears.
As it remains, despite the "fable" introductory to the film, *Life Is
Beautiful* cheapens the Holocaust experience, and insults your
intelligence. If I could advise you to leave the moment the trains show
up, you could then enjoy this film as "the lovable clown wins his
princess." The first half is really must-see material; the second half is
just plain odd.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Michael Dequina
_Life_Is_Beautiful_(La_Vita_E_Bella)_ (PG-13) **** (out of ****)
It would seem impossible to make a "Holocaust comedy," but Roberto Benigni
has not only made one, he has made a terrific one.  A national treasure in
his native Italy, Benigni co-wrote (with Vincenzo Cerami), directed, and
stars in the funny, poignant tale of Guido (Benigni), a Jewish bookstore
owner in fascist WWII Italy whose "beautiful" existence with wife Dora
(Nicoletta Braschi) and son Joshua (Giorgio Cantarini) is disrupted when
the entire family is sent to a concentration camp.  Although he is equally
terrified by harsh camp life tas anyone else, Guido is nonetheless
determined to shield his son from the truth of their horrific reality,
coming up with an elaborate, if desperate, cover story to convince Joshua
that everything is fine.
And that's how Benigni is able to maintain what would seem an improbable
balance: the film wins hearty, heartfelt laughs through Guido's creative
lies while never once downplaying the inhumane horror of the concentration
camp situation.  While one may often laugh at Guido's ruse, each laugh
comes with the lingering threat of death, which Benigni vividly yet fairly
subtly depicts (people being called for "showers," a brief glimpse of
charred bodies).  _La_Vita_E_Bella_'s lasting impression is not made by its
laughs or sense of reality, but its huge heart.  Strip away the harrowing
Holocaust setting, and Benigni's story is a simple, timeless, uplifting
tale of the ways (in this case, through laughter) love can bring out the
unlikely, but no less brave, hero in any man.  (opens October 23)
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com

Author
Mark O'Hara
Visit Online Film Critics Society at http://www.ofcs.org
There is a moment in 'Life is Beautiful' when the clownish Guido tells 
the girl of his dreams what they will do that evening.  He speaks as 
though reminiscing about a story that has become a perfect memory.
As the story progressed, I got the notion that I was watching a favorite 
film, one of the handful that I carry with me everywhere.  Roberto 
Benigni's 'La Vita e Bella' follows closely its early pronouncement in a 
brief voice-over:  it's a fable, perhaps sad and difficult to tell, but 
full of wonder and happiness.
Beginning in Italy in 1939, the story focuses on Guido Orefice (Benigni) 
and his exploits after he leaves the country for the city.  He travels 
with a friend who is a poet as well as an upholsterer.  Guido is a 
waiter;  he's also a solver of riddles, a supreme jokester, an 
aficionado of life.  Soon Guido happens upon Dora (Nicolletta Braschi), 
whom he dubs his "princess."  In a clever leit motif, Guido repeatedly 
surprises Dora in an astonishing variety of places and ways - he's a 
stalker, only lovestruck and hilarious.  After he wins her laughter and 
her heart, times passes and we see the couple with their child, four 
year-old Joshua.  Guido has finally realized his dream of running a 
bookshop, although the politics of the time - the early 'forties now - 
dictates his bookshop shutters be identified with "Jewish Store."  We 
catch glimpses of the happy life lived by Dora and Guido and Joshua, but 
it is not to last.
When Dora returns home one afternoon to find their villa ransacked and 
empty, the story takes a heart-breaking turn.  Guido and Joshua, along 
with Guido's uncle, have been sent to a concentration camp.  It's 
typical of the strength of Guido's love that he tries to protect his son 
from the trauma of the sudden truck- and cattle car-rides by happily 
deluding him.  Enlisting a formidable imagination and his uncle's help, 
Guido constructs an elaborate lie.  The trip is Joshua's birthday gift, 
a game during which one collects points for performing absurd and brutal 
duties.  The Nazis are "mean guys that yell";  Joshua must hide or risk 
being "eliminated" from the game;  the prize for amassing 1000 points is 
a tank, a real-life version of Joshua's favorite toy.  To complicate 
matters, Dora has desperately found her way aboard the train and into 
the camp, secluded from her male family members, of course.  In addition 
to perpetuating the myth of the game, Guido is faced with endeavoring to 
contact Dora, a feat he manages ingeniously.
To assert that the story is punctuated by comic relief would be 
irrelevant, for the film manages to sustain its humorous tone even as 
tragedy seeps into the narrative line.  Benigni's gift to the audience 
is his ability to juggle the subplots, to portray farcical elements 
often within the same sequences as sinister ones.  In one masterful 
tour-de-force, the crafty father pretends he is translating instructions 
from the camp guards to the Italian prisoners.  Eyes shifting endlessly, 
Guido improvises incredible and silly rules;  the result is his son's 
continuing belief in the protective charade.  
Benigni 's Guido is a sweet and hyperactive man, likable long before his 
character is tested by prejudice and internment.  Guido initiates 
several satirical digs at fascism, most memorably when he masquerades as 
a school inspector from Rome, charged with explaining to the school 
children the Italian claims to Aryan superiority.  Benigni is goofy and 
intelligent at once as he mumbles about racist Italian scientists, 
showing his audience of "bambini" his superior belly button and superior 
hip before the real inspector shows up and Guido goes out a window.  
Here Roberto Benigni echoes the performances of the best comedians of 
this century in their send-ups of Hitler's and Mussolini's thugs.
As Joshua, essentially the co-star of the picture, Giorgio Cantarini is 
outstanding.  What's remarkable is that he is so believeable in his 
expressions of extreme emotions.  Though assisted by Benigni's knowing 
direction, the boy's acting never seems fake-y.  One illustration occurs 
when Guido suddenly opens a bin in which Joshua has been hiding.  We see 
the wide-eyed child's look of genuine excitement, almost rowdiness, that 
precedes surprise.
Nicoletta Braschi, as Dora, seems unattainable at first - too beautiful 
and socially connected for Guido the Jewish waiter.  But we witness her 
succumb to Guido's considerable efforts, and the goodness radiates from 
her face.  Her cast of longing and love stuns the viewer in one scene, 
when Guido engineers the playing of their song - an Offenbach opera - so 
that it's audible in the women's barracks.  Her presence is heartening 
during the uncertain times of the film's setting, another goal to keep 
Guido struggling.
I've mentioned motifs already, but they warrant more.  Functioning as 
running jokes, several gags are tied in time and time again, striking 
chords that are magic as well as moving.  The sole criticism I can 
muster is that we need to see more of Dora's family's rejection of 
Guido.  After all, Guido is the interloper who literally carries Dora 
away from her husband-to-be, picking her up with his uncle's "Jewish 
horse"!  Otherwise, the dual themes of humor and menace play about the 
screen brilliantly.
Who will Roberto Benigni be compared with next, after Buster Keaton and 
Charles Chaplin?  That the film has been nominated for an Academy Award 
for Best Picture (and not merely Best Foreign Film), and Benigni for 
Best Actor, Director and Screenwriter (with Vincenzo Cerami) attests to 
its solid stance. (The film is already the recipient of the Best Foreign 
Film award from the Online Film Critics Society.) 'Life is Beautiful' 
takes risks and, unlike a lot of lesser films, earns its tears.  It is a 
must-see for all fans of movies, all devotees to human endurance, and 
all passionate lovers of this beautiful life.


Author
Matt Williams
Life is Beautiful is a rare treat:  a lighthearted comedy that tackles a
very serious subject without committing the sins of being disrespectful,
or, even worse, humorless.  It combines a charming romance with a dash
of farce, stirs in a little poignancy, and ends up a very enjoyable
movie. It's an Italian film, but don't let that discourage you.
Subtitle-phobes will be missing a wonderful experience.
Life is Beautiful opens as a sweet romantic comedy, with the clownish,
but good natured Guido (Roberto Benigni) arriving in a rustic Italian
town to work as a waiter for his uncle.  The year is 1939, and Guido
literally stumbles into the girl of his dreams, Dora (Nicoletta
Braschi). Their romance seems to be picture perfect, with only one
stumbling block: she's already engaged to another man.  Can Guido
overcome the odds and win his girl? What do you think?
However, five years later, things have taken a turn for the worse in
Italy.  The fascists have stepped up their race initiatives, which is
bad news for the Jewish Guido and his new son Giosue (Giorgio
Cantarini), who are rounded up and shipped off to a concentration camp.
Unable to protect his boy in any other way, Guido attempts to shield his
young son from the horrors of the labor camp.  He pretends that
everything is all an elaborate game, with points awarded for such tasks
as hiding, being brave and being very very quiet.
As you can tell from the description, Life is Beautiful has two very
different tones, but manages to excel at both of them.  As a romantic
comedy, it is sweet and funny.  As a bittersweet tale of hope amid
despair, it is touching.
Roberto Benigni's work here has been compared with some of the best of
Chaplin's, and it is easy to see why.  He is able to run the gamut of
comic expression, from slapstick to farce, with a warm-hearted feeling
that celebrates his downtrodden hero's "triumph of the underdog" spirit.
Life is Beautiful treads a thin line when it turns its attentions to the
Holocaust.  However, it is able to successfully navigate the minefield,
without demeaning the gravity of the horrors involved, nor without
losing its humorous edge that allows you to smile through the tears.
With Life is Beautiful, Benigni has created a triumphant, but
bittersweet comedy. It's quite simply one of the most enjoyable times
I've had at the movies this year.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Author
Jeffrey Huston
Directed by Roberto Benigni. Produced by Gianluigi Braschi and Elda Ferri.
Screenplay by Roberto Benigni and Vincenzo Cerami. Distributed by Miramax
Films. Running time: 120 minutes. Release date: October 23, 1998 in NY/LA;
wider over the coming weeks.  (Italian film with subtitles)
(to read this review complete with pictures from the film, go to:
http://www.impactprod.org/people/huston/life.htm )
The idea: a comedy set in a World War II concentration camp. Sounds like
"Hogan's Heroes", but it's not. In fact, nothing could be further from the
truth. "Life is Beautiful (La Vita E' Bella)", from acclaimed Italian
filmmaker and comedic actor/director Roberto Benigni, achieves the
unthinkable. It uses comedy to tell a deeply moving story set against the
backdrop of this century's greatest horror, the Holocaust. With the haunting
memories of "Schindler's List" still fresh in the psyche of our culture,
Benigni's approach first appears to be potentially tasteless and offensive.
That's why it is all the more impressive that this is a film that is
reverent, honorable, and inspiring. Through Roberto Benigni's joy of spirit,
"Life is Beautiful" powerfully reaffirms life itself.
Like all great films, "Life is Beautiful" is best viewed without prior
knowledge of key plot elements. One of my greatest pleasures in watching it
was that I knew nothing of the film's story aside from its basic premise.
Therefore I will not detail a synopsis here, but rather discuss the story's
structure, the film's performances, as well as its themes.
The first and second halves of "Life is Beautiful" are as different from one
another as they are necessary to each other. The first half is a charming,
magical romantic fable (filled with moments of glorious color) that could
have been pulled straight out of Hollywood's Golden Age of the 1930s and
40s. There is a sweetness about it rarely seen in modern cinema. It isn't
until the film's second half that the concentration camp comes into play.
Some may watch it and feel that it is two different films put together. I do
not feel that would be an accurate view. Rather, "Life is Beautiful" has a
defined two-act structure. Within the first act's joy and romance, there are
moments of subtle foreshadowing that hint at the elements to come. And
without the first act's charm and humor, the film's second act would seem
peculiar and oddly inappropriate. The two halves feed off of each other; one
is not complete without the other. It is by seeing the first half that we
can view the second half in a proper emotional context. It is an extremely
difficult weaving of vastly differing moods, but it is done masterfully by
Benigni. The mixture of humor with evil is a precarious balancing act, one
that seems virtually impossible to achieve. It is Benigni's deep
appreciation and sensitive understanding of humanity that enables him to
make this film work.
Roberto Benigni, along with being the film's lead actor, also serves as
writer and director. Needless to say, this film is Benigni in every sense of
the word. Among the film's strengths, it is Benigni's performance that is
the strongest. He evokes memories of Charlie Chaplin, virtually the only
actor since that era who has done so. His gift for physical comedy is rooted
not in the situation but the character. He also uses the props around him,
as Chaplin did, in a very unique and entertaining way. Benigni is nothing
short of a comedic genius.
But perhaps more than anything, the trait that really makes Benigni so
special is the joy he exudes. It seems to just pour out of him. His
portrayal of Guido truly is one of a person who takes great pleasure in
always finding life's beauty. It is through him that we are able to see
beauty, even when the circumstances are helacious.
The film is blessed with superior, at times transcendent, performances by
its supporting cast. Nicholetta Braschi plays Dora, Guido's love interest.
She is a woman who seems to have it all. But it is through Guido that she is
awakened to life's true blessings. It is a subtle, heartfelt performance by
Brashci, one of the better female performances of the year. Giustino Durano
plays the District Attorney, a man of power who befriends Guido. His
character arch is a unique one with a subtle evolution. Just when you think
you know him, you realize that you don't.
There must be some international law that all good foreign films must have a
great performance by a child actor ("Ponette", "Cinema Paradiso", "Kolya").
If there is such a law, then "Life is Beautiful" sure has abided by it.
Giorgio Cantarini plays Giosue', Guido's son. He becomes an integral part in
the film's second half. Unaware of the real reason why he and his father are
at the concentration camp, Giosue' believes and trusts the reasons as to why
his father says they are there. Cantarini's innocence is sweet and loveable.
He makes you yearn for that innocence to not be lost.
The script, by Benigni and Vincenzo Cerami, is one of the year's best
efforts. They find unexpected but magical ways to interweave various plot
elements and characters. Two story lines that seemingly have nothing to do
with each other eventually intersect. These are soft, tender moments that
take you pleasantly by surprise. It's what gives the film much of its charm
as well as its depth.
The moments of foreshadowing in the film's first half are particularly
strong. I think of one scene in particular where Guido's horse is painted
bright green with various racial slurs (Guido is Jewish). He playfully
brushes this off, finding humor even in this. His thinking is, of course,
that it is ultimately harmless. Certainly things could not get any worse,
right? Of course our hindsight tells us otherwise, making this scene all the
more sad.
Benigni displays great talent as a director in this scene with his use of
the film's score. Up to this point, Nicola Piovani's music is playful and
bright. But as Guido laughs about this incident with the horse, we hear the
first use of music that is somber and foreboding. It is in direct contrast
to Guido's mood. The music represents what we, the audience, already know of
what is to come. It also begins the transition between the film's first and
second half. This is expert direction by Benigni, using music to add depth
and develop the story's dramatic build.
There is a powerful aspect to "Life is Beautiful" that doesn't make itself
overtly apparent. It is something that, while I caught it during the course
of the film, I did not fully comprehend until afterward. It was immediately
after seeing the film that as I began to meditate on the character of Guido,
it hit me in the pit of my soul. What I realized is that in the character of
Guido was one of the most powerful examples of courage that I had ever seen
in film.
The reason it is not obvious is because humor is not commonly associated
with bravery, particularly in cinema. It is not humor "per se" that is brave
here, but Guido's underlying motivation for using it. Benigni instills Guido
with a deep fatherly love for his son. It is this paternal instinct which
will do all that is possible in order to protect one's child. It is what
Guido uses to shield Giosue', even at the risk of his own life. Every day,
Guido must go through grueling physical and psychological abuse. But the
instant he sees his son, Guido is somehow able to summon the strength to
appear as if he has not a care in the world. It is a display of courage that
occurs in the most unlikely of ways; an act of selflessness that made an
indelible impact on my life.
In profound fashion, Guido personifies the axiom "Life is what you make it".
It is an unexpected, oddly passionate yet deeply emotional portrayal of a
father's sacrificial love for his son. Parents in particular will be moved
by Benigni's wholly original performance, one that I found to be both
humbling and inspirational.
While the film does take place in a concentration camp, there is not
excessive or graphic visual content. The hardships are portrayed and the
threat of evil is always present. But as Guido guards his son from the camp'
s horrors, director Benigni visually guards them from us as well.
"Life is Beautiful" is arguably the best foreign film to be released in the
United States since 1995's "The Postman (Il Postino)". Both released by
Miramax, "Life is Beautiful" warrants the promotional support given to "Il
Postino", which went on to receive Oscar nominations for Best Picture,
Director, Actor, Screenplay and Original Dramatic Score (which it won).
"Life is Beautiful" deserves to be embraced in the same manner.
At this year's Cannes Film Festival, Benigni and his film received a
ten-minute standing ovation from the audience that attended the screening,
an event unprecedented in the Festival's fifty-plus year history. It is no
wonder that it went on to win the Grand Jury Prize at Cannes. "Life is
Beautiful" is one of the most unique film experiences of the year. It is
also one of the best. What Benigni's film so poignantly show us is that in
the midst of the dark ugliness of death, the light of life shines at its
most beautiful.
(to read other reviews by Jeffrey Huston, visit his film review website
"Believe Me" at: http://www.impactprod.org/people/huston/core.htm )

Author
Eric Scharf
Cast: Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giustino Durano, Giorgio
Cantarini, Horst Buchholz
Director: Roberto Benigni
Producers: Gianluigi Braschi, Mario Cotone, and Elda Ferri
Screenplay: Vincenzo Cerami and Roberto Benigni
U.S. Distributor: Miramax Films
The scene:  a Nazi concentration camp.  Michael Palin is in a SS uniform,
clipboard in hand.  He asks each of a queue of prisoners, "Zyklon B?" 
Each replies, "Yes," and Palin says reassuringly, "Good; out the door,
shower on the left, one bar of soap each."  Eventually he gets to Eric
Idle, who when asked, "Zyklon B?" replies "Ah, no, freedom"  Flustered at
the novelty, Palin asks, "What?"  Idle explains, "Uh, freedom for me. 
They said that there was nothing really wrong with being a Jew, so they
said I could go free and get on a plane to England."  Palin is confused,
but no less pleased for Idle for it;  "Oh, well, that's jolly good.  Well,
off you go, then."  Idle relents, though, "No, I'm only pulling your
leg--it's Zyklon B really."  Palin is amused (and relieved), "Oh I see,
very good, very good.  Well, out the door--"  Idle enthusiastically
finishes Palin's sentence for him, "I know--out the door, shower on the
left, one bar of soap each," and bounds out the door.  The disruption
over, Palin turns his comforting mien to the next prisoner. 
Is the above any less funny than the Roman crucifixion version featured in
"Life of Brian"?  To me, it is (slightly).  And that "slightly" is,
ultimately, what will determine whether one can enjoy La Vita e bella as
fully as the Cannes jury apparently did.  Roberto Benigni's comic farce
set in Fascist Italy from 1939 to 1945 has been met with both unqualified
praise and righteous indignation, neither of which forms a satisfactory
response to the vexing challenge posed by Benigni's artistic choice. 
The first half of "La Vita e bella" is a romantic comedy as Benigni's
character Guido arrives in a Tuscan town to take a position as a waiter in
his uncle's restaurant and save up money to open a bookstore. This latter
ambition is thwarted by the bureaucratic hostility of Rodolfo, the local
Fascist potentate (Amerigo Fontani); meanwhile, the bulk of Guido's energy
is devoted to the pursuit of Dora (Nicoletta Braschi), who is of course
engaged to Rodolfo.  Awareness of the racist climate creeps in when Guido
impersonates a Fascist inspector at Dora's school in order to arrange a
date with her, and finds himself expected to give a lecture on the
superiority of the Aryan race.  The hilarious satire that results marks
the high-water mark of Benigni's attempt to marry his slapstick genius
with the historical reality of the Holocaust.  Subsequent foreshadowing
seems insultingly mild; our first notice of Guido's Jewishness is
occasioned by the "vandalism" visited upon his uncle:  his horse is
painted green and labeled "Achtung! Jewish horse!"  Kristallnacht this is
not.  Eventually (and very entertainingly), Guido wins out and convinces
Dora to marry him instead. 
Flash forward five years:  Guido and Dora are married, they have a son,
Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini), and Guido owns his bookstore (Rodolfo must
have left town in shame rather than use his formidable resources to harry
Guido).  When Giosue asks why certain businesses have signs stating "No
dogs or Jews allowed", rather than giving his son a useful lesson on the
perils of being Jewish in an anti-Semitic society, Guido makes a joke
about how they will put up a sign in their store stating "No spiders or
Visigoths."  One day, Dora comes home to find that Guido, his uncle, and
Giosue have been arrested.  In order to spare his son the reality of what
is about to happen to them (!), Guido decides to pretend that everyone in
the camp is competing in a contest, the grand prize being a real,
life-size tank, and that by hiding from the guards (who "aren't really
mean; that's just they way they have to act in order to win the game"),
Giosue will help them earn points toward victory.  Dora gallantly demands
to be let on the same train with her family, which helps Giosue believe
his father's fabrication.  Rather than being a desperate struggle to avoid
death, however, the film remains a comic farce as the SS guards are
straight men to be mocked by Guido, and the other prisoners merely part of
the scenery (or worse, obstacles to Guido's fantasy, as when one
inconsiderately tells Giosue that "they make buttons and soap out of us",
providing another occasion for Guido to make fun of industrial-scale
murder). 
My poor reaction to the second half of the film is particularly vexing, as
I have long protested against any tendency to apotheosize the Holocaust as
the single greatest evil in history, to set it beyond the realm of
comparison with other human atrocities.  To do so, to call the Holocaust
"inhuman", to claim that the hatred, cowardice, and submission of
individual conscience to group "will"  exhibited in Nazi-dominated Europe
is qualitatively different from that displayed in other atrocities before
and since, is to blind oneself to the very human qualities that made the
Holocaust possible, and therefore to invite it to happen again.  I am
therefore hard-pressed to explain why Benigni made me uncomfortable and
Monty Python did not. 
It's not as if I'm (over-)sensitive to distasteful subject matter in
films.  I cheered the poetic justice at the cannibalistic climax of "The
Cook, the Thief, His Wife & Her Lover".  More recently, I was genuinely
sympathetic to the plights of Dylan Baker's and Philip Seymour Hoffman's
characters in "Happiness", and when Ian McKellen's Nazi war criminal in
"Apt Pupil" maneuvered the film's title character into finding out,
first-hand, just "what it was like," I cackled right along with McKellen. 
So why couldn't I let myself be charmed by Benigni's undoubted comedic
talents into accepting the film's triumphant conclusion?
Despite today's marketers' ham-fisted-best attempts to spin-target film
trailers and commercials, there's really no longer any excuse for
film-goers not to know what they're getting into.  While the number of
films that I have walked out of (or wish that I had) prior to film's end
can be counted on one hand, my awareness of the film's controversial plot
no doubt spared me the rude surprise that must have befallen the handful
of people who walked out of "La Vita e bella" (much fewer, it must be
said, than walked out of any of the three films mentioned above).  This
awareness, however, primed me to be on the alert for any attempt by
Benigni to dilute the Holocaust to make room for his buffoonery.  But why
should I care?  Perhaps I was afraid that Benigni's film could not avoid
appearing to say that more Jews would have survived the camps had they
memorized more Buster Keaton routines.  Another viewer offered the
interpretation that the film's concentration camp scenes are to be seen as
the perspective of the five-year-old Giosue.  This is a cogent point, as I
was fully able to enjoy the child's perspective on the London Blitz in
John Boorman's "Hope and Glory" (to be sure, Boorman never pretended that
the Luftwaffe dropped cotton candy).
I have come to conclude that the historical context of the last fifty
years prevents me from not insisting on deadly accuracy in every depiction
of the Holocaust.  Paradoxically, while the Holocaust is one of the most
thoroughly documented genocides in history, its authenticity has come
under the most venomous attack.  I was born 23 years after the last camp
was liberated, yet that's not long enough for me to be untouched by the
mandate, "Never Forget."  Benigni isn't exempt from this, either; he's not
some ignorant American high school student turning in a paper claiming the
Holocaust wasn't as bad as everyone says.  When Guido comically
mistranslates the German guard's instructions to the prisoners in order to
establish the "rules of the game" for Giosue, Benigni wants us to forget
that their fellow prisoners will suffer for their ignorance of camp
regulations.  When Guido and his son take over the camp's PA system to
wish a happy birthday to Dora in the women's barracks, Benigni wants us to
forget that, as a consequence, Giosue will most surely be discovered and
gassed.  When Guido is sprinting about in drag in order to reunite his
family just prior to the camp's liberation, Benigni wants us to forget
that by war's end few prisoners possessed the strength to walk, let alone
pratfall.
I recognize that my inability to accept a watered-down version of the
Holocaust is a cultural artifact, part of a historical context populated
by both camp survivors and virulent revisionists.  If there were any doubt
that Benigni does not also share this context, it is dispelled by the fact
that the moral that Benigni proposes we draw from "La Vita e bella", that
in the face of hardship and cruelty beyond our control we are responsible
only for the bravery of the individual spirit, is straight out of the
Existential tradition that followed the Second World War.  Where Benigni's
philosophy fails is that that same tradition requires an honest
confrontation with the horrors of the human condition, which Benigni
denies us in "La Vita e bella" (a phrase from Trotsky, written while
awaiting assassination by Stalin's thugs).
Perhaps in another fifty years, when all the survivors and anyone who knew
them are gone, it will no longer be distasteful to make a vaudeville out
of Auschwitz.  Part of me feels that's all it is, a matter of taste. 
There are plenty of people, from critics to film-makers to ordinary folk,
who think Benigni's comic talents and his life-affirming message transcend
the historical inaccuracies of the film, and I know enough of them well
enough to be unable to dismiss them as morally handicapped.  My
difficulties with "La Vita e bella" will certainly not prevent me from
enjoying Benigni's other work, nor will I deny that the poeticism of the
film's final scene makes a compelling case for Benigni's excellent
craftsmanship as a film-maker.  I admire Benigni, and I'm in awe of what
he thought he was attempting.  In an era which most of the film industry's
attention and money goes to abominations like "Armageddon" and
"Pleasantville", it's hard to accuse "La Vita e bella" of poor taste.  I
will therefore settle for accusing it of poor timing. 

Author
Kleszczewski, Nicholas
What a great film.  What a stunning, touching, heart-wrenching,
heart-warming, life-affirming, miraculous film.
>From its opening moments, _Life is Beautiful_ walks that fine line
between serious tragedy and uplifting comedy.  A car with no brakes
speeds through the town, and Guido (Roberto Benigni) motions people to
move out of the way.  They mistake him to be the Fascist president,
traveling to their town that day.  Heil! Heil!  Huh?  Shortly
thereafter, the president drives through, and people stare, with blank
faces.
This is standard, but somehow fresh and postmodern stuff: the clown
who is also a Jew, triumphs over the anti-Semitic society in which he
= lives.  Granted, _The Great Dictator_ comes to mind--Charlie
Chaplin+s almost masterpiece.  I think LIB (which Benigni wrote and
directed) trumps GD in one essential point: Chaplin+s Jewish Barber
gives a great speech at the climax, but to do so, he had to break
completely from character.  Benigni is given a similar situation: he
is mistaken as a Fascist dignitary, and must explain to a classroom
filled with schoolchildren = on how scientists have concluded that
Aryans are the superior race.  Benigni+s Guido stays in character, and
delivers the speech, keeping = the subject matter intact while showing
the absurdity of its concept.  It = is one of the great satirical
scenes in modern cinema.
There are many other scenes, especially in the first half, which are
bright and loopy and funny and silly.  Slapstick reigns, and although
the film is subtitled, there was no doubt that a universal language
was being conveyed.  And although it+s focus is on the courtship of
Guido = to Dora (played by Nicoletta Braschi, Benigni+s real life
wife), a silent undercurrent creeps in.  This is clearly a racist
society, evidenced by the aforementioned scene and others, and it will
soon affect him and = his family.
The second half of the film takes place five years later, in an
unnamed concentration camp, where Guido, Dora (by her insistence), and
their five-year old son, Giosu=E9 (Giorgio Cantarini), are deported.
Guido, seeing the horrors, is desperate to protect his wife and child.
For = his wife, who is separated from him, he must find ways to
communicate to = her that he is all right.  For his son, (and this is
the most controversial part of the film) he convinces the youngster
that this is all one big elaborate game: it+s rules include hiding,
being very quiet, and learning to not ask for seconds.
Which raises the big questions: How do we deal with pain?  With
persecution?  With injustice on the worst level?  It+s said that
tragedies bring out the best in people, finding strengths they did not
realize they had.  Other times they deteriorate, become overwhelmed =
with little strength or incentive to swim.  Sometimes even, people
giggle in these moments, as if there were a vacant emotion behind
them, yearning for some brightness to soothe their wounds.
Benigni+s Guido realizes this.  He is the clown, but he is not a fool.
He sees the slurs and the vandalism, and while feeling the weight of =
the verbal attacks, he still has the audacity to see if everyone
around = him, perhaps even the antagonists, laugh.  His liberty is
stripped, but not his dignity, and certainly not the dignities of
those around him.  It+s obvious from the onset that here is someone
who is very much against Fascism and the preposterousness of an Aryan
nation, but does so with a grinning, joyful demeanor.
Perhaps that is a form of denial.  Perhaps his alternate reality is
all that he could muster (not unlike the very different _Brazil_).
Or...  perhaps this is an example of great fortitude, with no weapons
but = wit.  Whatever his purposes is subject to debate, but also a
sure sign that this is one of the great three-dimensional characters,
stranded amidst = a terrifyingly risky concept.  Surprisingly, it
works.
It is an important footnote that this film was not intended to be an
accurate reflection of the holocaust.  It+s not that the atrocities
are trivialized, far from it.  They don+t have to be broadcast and
explicitly shown to muster the same horror--less is more. I believe =
that Benigni was cautious to preserve the tone, and I like the theory
that = it is Guido+s alternate reality that we+re seeing.  However,
any criticism that this is rewriting history, that the holocaust
wasn+t as bad as it seems, is simply off-target.
Benigni+s film has won audience awards at Cannes, at Toronto, and is a
definite shoo-in for Best Foreign Language film (hopefully for Best
Picture as well).  He has been made an honorary Jew by a Jerusalem
film society.  It swept the Italian Academy awards.  Controversy
notwithstanding, it is one of the great films this year, and as of
this writing, the one to beat for best film.  Masterful.  Miraculous.
A must-see.

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Roberto Benigni.
Cast: Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio Cantarini.
1998 - 116 minutes.
Rated PG-13 (for adult themes).
Reviewed January 20, 1999, courtesy Miramax Films.
In many ways Roberto Benigni's "Life is Beautiful" is a courageous 
motion picture. After all, I don't believe anyone in the past has had 
the audacity to set a comedy against the backdrop of the very serious 
Holocaust, nor would anyone want to. By creating such a light-hearted 
tone for a film about one of the most cruel and heartbreaking periods in 
recent history, it would be easy to offend viewers, especially those 
whom have a personal connection with the Holocaust. Benigni, however, 
who directed the film and stars in the lead role, somehow succeeds at 
such a genre-bending convention (or unconvention, if you think about 
it), finding just the right balance between humor and drama so that the 
film in no way is condescending to the subject matter.
The film begins as the Jewish-Italian Guido, a happy-go-lucky fellow 
(Benigni), arrives in a postcard-perfect Tuscan village where he stays 
at his uncle's home and obtains a job as a waiter at a nearby ritzy 
restaurant. Almost immediately, Guido runs into, or shall we say is hit 
by, the beautiful, kind schoolteacher Dora (Nicoletta Braschi) when she 
accidentally falls from a barn. After a pleasant and rather mystifying 
meeting, fate seems destined to bring the pair together when he runs 
into her a few more times (literally, when he crashes his bike, and 
figuratively, at the school where she works). The first hour of "Life is 
Beautiful" is a winning, sweet, and often funny romantic comedy, and 
Benigni constantly reminded me of the old comic greats Buster Keaton and 
Charlie Chaplin.
Seven years pass and we discover that Guido and Dora are now married and 
have a young son (Giorgio Cantarini). All is well in their lives, and at 
the bookstore Guido owns, until anti-semitism slowly begins to make 
appearances in the village, first by having store signs put up saying, 
"No Jews or Dogs," and then by having their own home torn apart. 
Ultimately, Guido and his son are taken away to a concentration camp and 
are split apart from Dora, who is forced to go with the female 
prisoners. Through the horrors of the Holocaust which are only briefly 
shown in a shocking and haunting image of a mountain of dead bodies, 
Guido keeps his spirits up and tells his son that everything is only a 
game, and if they are the first people to reach one one-hundred points, 
they will win the grand prize: a real, life-size tank to ride home on.
For its first hour, "Life is Beautiful" is a film full of magic, 
recalling the days of those '40s and '50s musicals. In its romantic 
story involving Guido and Dora, the film contains an undeniable 
innocence that is rarely seen in today's films, and as our protagonist, 
Guido (effervescently played by Benigni) is a pure charmer.
In its second half, the film becomes more tricky, since it was up to 
Benigni to keep the picture's light tone while still being realistic 
about the life of a Jew in a concentration camp. When taking into 
consideration Steven Spielberg's brilliant 1993 Holocaust drama, 
"Schindler's List," the Holocaust in "Life is Beautiful" is like a walk 
in the park. No on-screen violence is depicted, although there are hints 
of the gas chambers that look like showers, but on the other hand, the 
film not once actually treats the Holocaust as a joke. Instead, the 
picture attempts to portray a hopeful and spirited man that 
unfortunately happens to be a Jew in the 1940's and therefore is sent 
away to what is basically a horror show. If the film had actually become 
heavy on violence and brutality in this section, then the tone would 
have been ruined. It is clearly due to Benigni's artistry in filmmaking 
that he is easily able to mix these two differing elements so that it is 
neither too goofy or too sad.
"Life is Beautiful" honestly only missteps once, but it is in this flaw 
that detains the film from being a possible contender as one of the ten 
best of 1998. The penultimate sequence took a sudden u-turn into the 
realms of a sort of fantasy and, without giving it away, I found its 
last plot development to be entirely unbelievable and abrupt, as if 
Benigni was trying to rush to a quick conclusion so that the film would 
be over. Perhaps if the running time had contained an extra ten minutes, 
these occurrences would not have been so difficult to swallow. As it 
remains, the unfortunate ending takes away the possible greatness "Life 
is Beautiful" so clearly held, but the film is still an achievement, 
particularly because of Benigni, who took an almost impossible concept 
and brought it vibrantly to life.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html

Author
Bill Chambers
LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL (LA VITA Č BELLA) **** (out of four)
-a review by Bill Chambers (wchamber@netcom.ca)
[For past reviews, bi-weekly trivia, etc., visit
FILM FREAK CENTRAL
http://www.geocities.com/~billchambers/ ]
starring Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio Cantarini, Giustino
Durano
screenplay by Roberto Benigni and Vincenzo Cerami
directed by Roberto Benigni
At last May's Cannes' awards ceremony, hyphenate Benigni-whose LIFE IS
BEAUTIFUL had just won the Grand Jury Prize-jumped from his seat, bowed
at jury president Martin Scorsese's feet, and danced around the stage
with tears in his eyes. It was a rare moment of humour at the stuffy,
elitist festival, and his reaction instantly disarmed a deadly serious
audience. In short, for a few brief moments he turned Cannes into
something it arguably had never been before: funny and sweet. His film
pulls off a similar magic trick: LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL is a bittersweet
comedy that takes place (mostly) in a concentration camp.
Benigni stars as Guido, a clever and warm Jewish-Italian waiter who
relentlessly pursues "princess" Dora (Braschi) until she can no longer
resist him; within a few years, they are married and with child, the
inquisitive Giosué (Cantarini). But not long after Guido also realizes
his dream of opening a bookstore is he herded, along with his son and
uncle (Durano), to the camps. (Loving Dora, whose heritage allows her to
stay behind, joins them anyway.)
Guido wants to protect Giosué from the horrible truth, so he tells his
son that they are players of a complex game: the winner gets to ride in
a tank! (I loved the moment when Guido voluntarily mistranslates a
barking soldier's orders just so he can establish a set of "rules": no
talking, hide from the mean-looking men in uniforms, and don't ask for
sandwiches.) The boy's eventual suspicions force Guido to cover up his
lies with more lies: one brilliant sequence has Giosué disguised as a
German boy so he can enjoy a big fancy dinner at which Guido has been
asked to wait tables-Giosué has no idea how close he comes to being
killed after accidentally applauding his meal in Italian.
The first third of LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL is very whimsical; nothing prepares
us for its narrative's left turn. Benigni moves with the grace of Fred
Astaire, can take a pratfall like Buster Keaton, and at times his verbal
pitter-patter is a one-man Abbott and Costello routine; Benigni is the
current clown prince of cinema. (Is it any wonder Blake Edwards tried to
revive the Pink Pather series with Benigni as the son of Inspector
Clouseau?) It is thanks to Benigni's benign performance (his eyes
project nothing but sincerity) that not one second of LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL
is maudlin or cloying; that said, I can't imagine a person unmoved by
the film's ending. Guido is a completely unselfish man who simply
utilizes his gifts to make the best of the worst situation. He does what
many a father would do, and the climax drives that point home.
Before the haunting LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL took home its Cannes award (it
also recently won the Toronto International Film Festival's Audience
Award), there was speculation that its subject matter might stir up
controversy. By now, I'm sure the unanimously positive reaction to the
film has quelled the Jewish community's (among others) fears; LIFE IS
BEAUTIFUL does not make light of the holocaust whatsoever. Instead, it
embraces the bravery of its victims, and educates its audience through
truly accessible characters.

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
STARRING:  Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio
                Cantarini, Horst Buchholz, Sergio Bustric
DIRECTOR:  Roberto Benigni
WRITERS:   Roberto Benigni and Vincenzo Cerami
RATED:     PG-13
RELEASED:  1997 (1988 in the USA, subtitled)
        Roberto Benigni's "Life is Beautiful" is the sort of film
which exemplifies the power of cinema: it's art without pretension,
hope without fear, dreams without restrictions.  Although it has been
criticized as a sanitization of the Holocaust, the movie pulls no
emotional punches; by sharing the hardships and joy of the characters,
we are reminded just how precious and remarkable the human spirit is.
        It's 1939 Italy, and Guido Orefice (Benigni) is a pleasant,
amiable waiter who works in a restaurant owned by his uncle.
Clever and impulsive, Guido uses humor as an ally while serving his
customers, making him well-liked, especially by Dr. Lessing (Horst
Buchholz), a German who shares Guido's fondness for puns and riddles.
Their relationship is particularly intriguing, as Guido is Jewish.
        When a chance meeting with the lovely Dora (Nicoletta
Braschi, Benigni's real-life spouse) sets his heart aflutter, Guido
goes to great lengths to win her love, despite her engagement to
a snooty government official.  Their mutual affection gradually
deepens into something more, culminating in a wonderful scene in
which Guido disrupts Dora's engagement party to whisk her away on
horseback.  It's here that a more conventional film would end... but
there's nothing conventional about "Life is Beautiful," and this scene
occurs less than halfway through the story.
        Flash forward six years to 1945: Guido and Dora are happily
married, and are now parents to a five-year old son named Giosue'
(Giorgio Cantarini).  Fortune has been good to them: Guido even owns
the bookstore he's always wanted!  But Guido's Jewish heritage is
discovered by a facist-filled government, and he and his son are sent
to an unidentified concentration camp.  Dora, a Gentile, is not
required to attend the camp, but she demands to go with her family;
her devotion to her husband and child is that selfless.
        Young Giosue' is frightened, but it's here that Guido
gives his greatest performance, convincing his son that they are
embarking on a grand adventure, an epic game that will be exciting
and fun.  (The prize for winning the game?  A full-size tank!)  Guido
knows that the Nazi officers who run the camp are looking for reasons
to dispose of the prisoners, so he tells Giosue' that he (Giosue') can
win extra points for hiding, remaining silent for long periods of
time, etc.  These are poignant scenes, as father and son rekindle each
other's enthusiasm and optimism (Dora is in a different part of the
segregated camp).  Although the other children are gradually
disappearing into the camp's gas chambers, Guido uses humor to keep
his son oblivious to their fate, sparing Giosue' from the emotional
agony and sense of helplessness that he himself is feeling.
        The structure of "Life is Beautiful" is somewhat like Robert
Rodriguez's "From Dusk Til Dawn," in the sense that each half of
the film has a completely different tone, joined together by a
startlingly abrupt transition.  It's ingenious and effective: both
halves of the movie are masterfully constructed, but as different as
night and day.  The warm, sunny first half establishes these wonderful
characters and their relationships; we see Guido's remarkable
personality in full-swing, and witness the passion and joy he derives
from simple, ordinary activities.  These early moments also set up
his fairy-tale love affair with Dora (Guido refers to her as his
"princess" throughout the story), and their devotion to each other is
made clear-- we understand why she is willing to follow Guido to a
concentration camp.  The story's second half, by contrast, uses their
love as a foundation on which to build triumph and tragedy.  The
construction is as elegant as any I've encoutered.
        It's impossible not to like Benigni's warm portrayl of Guido,
the sort of clown who inspires laughter as much by accident as
deliberate effort; his mannerisms are so broad and cartoonish that
comparisons with Chaplin are justified.  Benigni, who not only
starred but directed and co-wrote the screenplay as well, has a
masterful sense of comedic timing.  The material flows effortlessly
through him, lending both spontaneity to the gags and power to the
drama.
        Benigni doesn't skimp on the humor, despite the subject
matter; even during the horrific scenes inside the camp, Guido is
full of life and optimism-- a veritable beacon of hope and sunshine
for his fellow prisoners and, most importantly, his son.  There are
those who have called the film "offensive" because of the way it
handles its Holocaust-related material.  They are mistaken: this movie
isn't *about* the Holocaust; it's about humanity, love, and the
desperate facade one man must invent to spare mental anguish for
his son.  The Holocaust is merely a backdrop.
        There are perhaps ten genuine laugh-out-loud moments in
"Life is Beautiful," sprinkled in among the tragedy; like the
characters in the film, Guido's antics make the despair bearable for
us, right up to the movie's final moments, which involve the triumph
of the human spirit over the unimaginable forces of adversity.  The
film soars, heartens, saddens, uplifts, rejoices... and, like life, is
beautiful indeed.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please write to:
joefilm-subscribe@listbot.com
----
"Average Joe" Barlow  (jbarlow@earthling.net)  MiSTie #73097
Joe Barlow on Film: http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
"The one good thing about the [life-size sticker of
 Jar Jar Binks on the door of Taco Bell] is you can
 pretty convincingly throw the SOB a roundhouse punch.
 I found it satisfying."   --Renard A. Dellafave

Author
Bob Bloom
 Roberto Benigni is a clown in the tradition of Chaplin and Keaton.
 This Italian film star, best known in the United States for the poorly
received Son of the Pink Panther, has done the near impossible by creating
a comic fable about the Holocaust.
 But Benigni's Life Is Beautiful (La Vita E Bella) is not so much a story
of the Holocaust as it uses that monstrous outrage against humanity as a
backdrop to tell a story of familial love, devotion and sacrifice.
 The movie starts out as a typical slapstick farce with Benigni's Guido
arriving in the small Tuscan town of Arezzo in 1938 to fulfill his dream of
owning a bookstore.
 Like many of the slapstick clowns who preceded him, most notably the
almost-forgotten  Harry Langdon,  Benigni's Guido has a childlike
innocence. He ignores the growing anti-Semitism of the Fascist government.
 Instead, Guido ardently falls in love and persues Dora, a local school
teacher who already is engaged to a local Fascist official.
 In Benigni's tightly wound script this is the same Fascist official with
whom Guido had an earlier unfortunate - yet slapstick - encounter.
 Fast forward about five years. Guido, Dora, and their 5-year-old son,
Giosue´ (Giorgio Cantarini)  are a happy family. Guido has finally
fulfilled his dream of opening a bookstore.
 But racial and anti-Semitic tensions are on the rise in Italy, and Guido
has determined to do his best to shield his son from these harsh realities.
 The task becomes even the more difficult when the family is deported to a
concentration camp. Here, Guido must use all his skill and imagination not
only to shield his son, but to keep him from being exterminated.
 It is at this juncture in Life Is Beautiful may tend to offend those whom
the Holocaust has touched. For the scenes in the concentration camp lack
the horror, the pain, the unimaginable suffering of a Schindler's List.
 True, many Italian Jews were not deported until the war was nearly over,
and most were not sent to the death camps, but to work camps where they
were used as slave labor.
 Unlike Steven Spielberg, Benigni is not out to tell the story of the
Holocaust. His story is about family and the lengths a parent will go to
protect a child.
 For Guido, to save his son, transforms the entire experience into an
elaborate game. Giosue´ must follow the rules without question to amass
1,000 points. The winner takes home a tank.
 Therefore, Guido tells him, he must remain hidden in the barracks. He
cannot make a sound nor allow the guards to see him.
 Guido explains this during a hilarious sequence when a German guard barks
the camp instructions to the newly arrived inmates. Guido, lying that he
understands German and can translate for his fellow prisoners, instead lays
down the rules for his son to allow him a chance to survive.
 Throughout their imprisonment, Guido's quick thinking continually keeps
his son from harm's way.
 Ultimately, the allies rescue the camp. In a poignant scene, Giosue´ comes
out of hiding just as an American tank rolls into the compound. The boy
goes wide-eyed with wonderment and delight, thinking he has won the game.
 The price for his victory is most high.
Benigni has succeeded in using the blackest moment in human history to
prove that even in hell, a ray of hope and salvation can penetrate the
darkness.
 Life Is Beautiful is a fantasy, a fable. It is not to be taken as a record
of the Holocaust. Those who object to it are missing its point.
 And that is simply where there is hope, where there is life and where
there is love, the spark of humanity will never be extinguished.
 Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind. He
can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net
Carol Bloom of Bloom Ink Publishing Professionals
3312 Indian Rock Lane  West Lafayette, IN 47906-1203
765-497-9320   fax 765-497-3112  cbloom@iquest.net
Committed to Lifelong Learning through Effective Communication 

Author
Matt Prigge
Director: Roberto Benigni
Writers: Vincenzo Cerami and Roberto Benigni
Starring: Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio Cantarini,
Giustino Durano, Sergio Bini Bustric, Marisa Peredes, Horst Bucholz,
Lidia Alfonsi
The entire world has been praising Roberto Benigni's "Life is
Beautiful," and I'm no exception to that.  I too think it's a wonderful
flick, but I suspect for different reasons.  Everyone's been praising
this as a great uplifter, a - oh, how did they put it? - "triumph of the
human spirit."  In fact, the opposite is true, and it took me awhile to
come to my conclusion that the entire film is about man's ability for
denial, and the way horrific instances cause certain people to pervert
reality in favor of themselves, and thus harm others considerably, if
not mortally, psychologically.  I can remember seeing it vividly: I
laughed through the first, magical half, then hardly peeped during the
second, except to let out a couple hollow laughs at some rather funny
moments.
But as I went home, I felt unsatisfied in my delight for the film, while
my movie-going companion seemed to think it was the greatest film of the
year, without a shred of doubt.  Cute, witty, and sad.  Sure, it was.  I
let that unsatisfaction subside, though, and I began to write the review
that everyone else had written - how it was wonderfully uplifting, as
good as the best of Chaplin, all that crap.  But the more I thought of
it, I decided that my primary reasoning had, in fact, been compeltely
off.
Let me lay out the film for you, first, to illustrate my point.  The
film, as you may have heard, is about the Holocaust, but it's also a
comedy (don't mesh those words together, though: this is not a
"holocaust comedy," as I describe it to some of my friends who haven't
seen it, jokingly).  Great Italian comic actor Roberto Benigni directs,
co-writes, and stars in the film as a hapless character who is a joyous
motormouth, a wonderfully adept physical comedian, and also energetic
and charismatic.  He's not exactly the Little Tramp or Buster Keaton or
anyone else from the silent era though: he's an original creation,
though a bit inspired by them.
But anyway, his character, Guido, moves to a lovely, picturesque Italian
city in the beginning of the film, and along the way, meets and falls in
love with a beautiful woman, Dora (Nicoletta Braschi, his wife and thus
his co-star).  She is, of course, engaged to another man, and of course,
he's a jerk and he hates Guido because of a hilarious situation that
happens early in the film.  Much of the first fifty minutes deals with
his attempts to woo her, by bending reality so that he can be with her,
and his attempts at becoming a respectable waiter so that he can make
money and one day open a bookstore of his own.
It's all rather predictable, and we've seen it all before, but that
hardly means it's arbitrary to the rest of the film; the first half is
hilarious and witty and charming and it's completely entertaining in the
way films today aren't.  Gags abound, and the romance between Guido and
Dora becomes sweet like romances aren't these days.  However, this first
half isn't just cuteness: it's deceptively complex, with hints that this
film may be deeper than just uplifting, and that Benigni probably just
didn't stumble onto something more interesting.  As Benigni courts Dora,
he finds he is able to bend reality, and soon keys are popping into his
hand at will, and she's becoming truly in love with him because he is so
magical and wonderful and so not the bore her temper-ridden fiance is.
By the time, he rides into her engagement reception on a horse and
sweeps her off her feet, the film has almost transcended any traces of
realism, and become a truly magical experience...and take note of that,
because they carry on a picturesque, near-perfect life together.  They
have a child named Giousé (Giorgio Cantarini), he opens the bookstore,
and they stay completely in love with eachother.  They also live in
Italy during the holocaust and Guido just happens to be Jewish, so when
he and Giousé are taken away by Nazis to go to concentration camp, their
life is shattered.
Now here's where the film becomes complicated, not to mention
controversial: in order to protect his son from the horrors, Guido lies
to Giousé and tells him that it's all a game, an adventure holiday
disguised as a horrific prison.  Points are handed out for doing things
like not asking for desert, and hiding from the Nazis, and not
screaming.  In fact, in one scene when a German officer comes into the
shack where the prisoners are held and asks for an interpretor, a
non-German-speaking Guido says he can translate and turns every word and
every gesture the officer makes into a description of the rules of the
game.  The complicated thing about this is is he really protecting
Giousé?  By the end (if you don't want to hear what happens, skip a
paragraph or three), when Guido has been gunned down by an officer for
making trouble, and Giousé thinks he has won the game by collecting a
thousand points, and is then reunited with his mother in one beautifully
uplifting reunion where they're both happy to see eachother and have no
clue their father and husband is lying in a ditch a couple miles away,
you have to wonder if this isn't the least uplifting film of the year
disguised as the exact opposite.  Though the narration by an older
Giousé says he's happy his father retained his son's humanity, it's a
wonder if everyone in this film isn't in deep denial, and if they are,
this has to be the entire point of the film.  Guido, a man who has been
able to pervert the truth for the entire film, finds himself in real
hellish conditions, and tries to fix them by lying to himself and to his
son, finally meets a tragic conclusion - not so uplifting anymore, eh?
But that's what's so extremely interesting about this film.  It's
deceptive and clever, and it certainly had me thinking it was something
else and not such a downbeat film.  In fact, this may be the greatest
hoax in contemporary cinema: the film has been praised as the great
humane film of the year, been awarded numerous accolades from
organizations who usually don't recognize films, and Benigni himself has
gone around discussing how it is a great message for his life, and how
his father used to water down the stories of his life in a concentration
camp to not freak his kids out.  Maybe a little bit older, Benigni has
recognized the errors of his father's ways: by not telling the truth, he
has perhaps awakened some deep psyhological demons in his son when he
learned the bitter truth about life, and Benigni, clever bastard that he
is, has constructed a film so complex that it can only be accurately
discerned by heavy thinking and a lack of suppression.  The fact that I
denied the final shot, the key to the entire film's truth, and thought
it was a great uplifter was one example of Benigni's genius as a
filmmaker.
In fact, out of all the reviews I've read for this film, only one other
critic in the entire world agrees with me, and that's Mike D'Angelo, who
makes the exact same case as I do, and likes it about as much as I do.
He too spotted the hints, the allusions to Schopenhauer, and the little
tricks Benigni uses to make his point about denial so incredibly
truthful, that if the only thing I have wrong with this film is that it
is deceptive.  I'm always a tad taken back at a film that uses
manipulation to make its own ends meet, and I'm a little appalled that
Benigni has let it go as far as he has (unless, of course, I'm reading
this film completely wrong, and that's not out of the question).
Add that along with the fact that the second half is just not as great
as it should be, even with the deception, and you have a film which is,
yes, great, but perhaps not as great as it could be.  I admire the fact
that it goes to such far lengths to get its point across.  But that
doesn't mean that it's perfect.  But as it is, "Life is Beautiful" may
be the most engagingly ironic film to ever hit the big screen - a film
that I fear may result in bad word of mouth if every critic realized the
truth behind the mask long after they've praised it for being so
incredibly "uplifting."
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Luke Buckmaster
Cast: Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giustino Durano, Sergio Bini
Bustric, Marisa Paredes, Horst Buchholz, Giorgio Cantarini
Director: Roberto Benigni
Screenplay: Roberto Benigni, Vincenzo Cerami
Australian theatrical release: December 26
In Italian with English subtitles
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
4 and a half stars
For the first forty-five minutes or so of Life is Beautiful, the setting
is Italy in the late 1930's.  For Italian Jew Guido Orefice (Roberto
Benigni), a lovable and quick-witted goof, life is fun.  Life is full of
pleasant surprises, romance and adventure.  Life is beautiful. "X years
later," things take a severe turn for the worse.  Orefice's surroundings
are no longer blissful, they are hostile.  Signs on shop windows
indicate that Jews and dogs are not allowed inside, and graffiti marks
decorate the walls of Jewish shops.  Life is not easy, but Orefice's
spirits are far from buried.
By the time Life is Beautiful reveals its dark core, Orefice is married
to Dora (Nicoletta Braschi), a Gentile, and they have a cute
five-year-old son named Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini).  When World War II
is nearly over, this charming family of three is imprisoned in a German
concentration camp.  Instead of revealing to his son the hopelessness of
their situation, Orefice pretends that they are involved in a harmless
game of hide and seek.  Giosue must avoid the men "playing the really
mean guys," or else him and his dad might not become "the winners" of
the make believe competition.
The remarkable thing about Life is Beautiful is that whilst it is a
holocaust movie, it is also a comedy, and a hilarious one at that.
Benigni's character is introduced during a long set of slapstick comedy
scenes, all of which resemble the work of Charlie Chaplain or even Mr.
Bean.  These are colorful and light-hearted moments that are - in their
most basic form - exceptional comedic work.  As we giggle, though, the
film's tone is changing, and we can feel it.  Benigni (also the director
and co-writer) does not give his audience an easy way out by defining
when the moment of emotional impact will occur. While we laugh, our
stomach begins to churn.
That is why Life is Beautiful has become the victim of a widely
conceived misguided criticism.  Due to the film's comedic nature, it has
been accused of ridiculing the Holocaust.  Never since critics dubbed In
the Company of Men as being just about men being cruel to woman has such
a ludicrous allegation occurred.  Strange as it may sound, but Life is
Beautiful would have actually been less powerful had it not had its many
moments of joy.  If it had just focused on the concentration camp, we
would not have had a period of time to compare it with.  Films like
Saving Private Ryan delve straight into the war itself, whereas Life is
Beautiful makes sure we know what kind of life its characters are
missing out on.
Roberto Benigni's performance as the extravagant Orefice seems at first
simplistic and one-dimensional.  But as the story moves along, an
interesting development occurs: Benigni simultaneously becomes the films
comedic character and its tool to evoke emotion.  Benigni shows unusual
talent for displaying a man who hides his fear and hatred, for the sake
of comforting his son.  Just dubbing this accomplishment as one of the
year's best performances probably doesn't give him justice; this is one
of the most unique acts you'll ever see.
If there is a definite fault in Life is Beautiful, it would lie in its
script and the way Benigni handles it.  On occasions, Benigni seems
unsure of where he wants to go, so he ponders more than he pursues.
That's fair enough when you imagine all the choices he would have had to
make - when to develop the "serious" side of his tale, when to tickle
the funny bone - but overall his direction is unmistakably brilliant.
So too, is this film.
Despite its depressing overture, Life is Beautiful is a beautiful
experience. Roberto Benigni doesn't just mix drama and comedy; he often
hides drama in the comedy.  In that way, we cry while we laugh, whilst
we celebrate a powerful and mesmerizing film achievement.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or lukebuckmaster@hotmail.com for any
inquiries or feedback
Read more of my reviews at Alphalink Movies:
http://moviezone.alphalink.com.au

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:   Roberto Benigni
Cast:  Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio Cantarini, Giustino
Durano, Serio Bini Bustric, Marisa Paredes, Horst Bucholz
Screenplay:  Vincenzo Cerami, Roberto Benigni
Producers:  Gianluigi Braschi, Elda Ferri
Runtime:   114 min.
US Distribution: Miramax
Rated PG-13:  holocaust-related thematic elements
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Roberto Benigni won big this year at the Oscars, snagging up both Best
Foreign Film and Best Actor for Life is Beautiful.  The film is actually
two pictures in one:  the first is about Guido Orefice (Benigni), and
his efforts to woo a young woman (played by Benigni's real-life wife,
Nicoletta Braschi).  This portion of the film is wonderfully funny and
unrelenting slapstick comedy.  But the slapstick tone is not even
marginally appropriate for a Holocaust setting, and so any attempt at
humor ends up failing (except for one superb moment in which Guido
intentionally screws up in translating orders from a German soldier). 
Overall, Life is Beautiful is an ambitious and heartfelt artistic
failure.

Author
Jason Wallis
I remember hearing about this film when it first appeared at Cannes over a
year ago, picking up the Grand Jury Prize at the festival. 'Holocaust
comedy receives standing ovation', the headlines read. Intrigued by this
statement, I looked up information on the film and found that, sure enough,
Life is Beautiful is in fact a comedy about the greatest atrocity of the
last thousand years. Even though the movie was extremely well-received by
critics and public alike, I couldn't help but be disgusted at this notion;
human tragedy is not something I feel should be celebrated. 
Only now do I see the error of my ways. After finally viewing the film for
myself after avoiding it for some time, it became clear that it is not, as
the headlines proclaimed, a "Holocaust comedy"; on the contrary, Life is
Beautiful does not even really depict the graphic events that took place in
Nazi deathcamps. Rather, it focuses on the relationship between a father
and his son, who he is trying desperately to shield from the horrors of
their situation. 
Roberto Benigni (who also wrote and directed the movie) stars as Guido
Orefice, a Chaplin-inspired clown and all round jolly guy who, as the film
opens, is vying for the affections of an attractive school teacher
(Nicoletta Braschi, Benigni real life spouse). Through the course of the
first hour or so, we see Guido striving to get the attention of this
"beautiful princess", as he calls her. Employing the magic of laughter, the
Italian comedian wins her heart and together, they raise a young boy named
Giosue (child actor Giorgio Cantarini). Life treats them well until
Hitler's minions rise to power, and the family is whisked away to a German
camp, where Guido becomes convinced that he must upholds his son's
innocence no matter what the sacrifice. 
Granted, it contains some uproariously funny moments both in and out of the
concentration camp, but it does not pull a "Hogan's Heros" and make light
of the slaughtering of some six million innocent Jews. Somehow, it achieves
hilarity without disrespecting it's gravely serious subject. 
So, we've established that Life is Beautiful is not a "Holocaust comedy".
But, there is another complete misrepresentation of this material that
really disturbs me. The film, despite critic's declarations of it being a
"triumph of the human spirit", is no such thing; not in my eyes, anyway.
Some have called the story an "affirmation of the beauty of life", but I
say it is a very dark and bleak statement about man's capability of denial
masquerading as an endearing comedy. The film's ending has been recognized
as the most entirely uplifting moment of any film released recently, but I
found it to be truly discerning and upsetting. Essentially, Life is
Beautiful is quite possibly the greatest hoax in the history of film.
However, I am not denying the movie's greatness. Believe me, it's
fantastic. I'm just saying that I think Benigni did something different
than what most people are interpreting it as. 
But perhaps I'm reading more into the movie than is really there. Maybe the
film's brilliance relies on the idea that the viewer can interpret the
meaning of it in any way they see fit. In fact, maybe Roberto Benigni has
made a film that is the sole argument for the old saying that you get out
of a movie exactly what you put into it. 
*Homepage at http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475
**Complimentary video cassette courtesy of Miramax Films at  
http://www.miramax.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Miramax Films
 Director:  Robert Benigni
 Writer:  Vincenzo Cerami, Robert Benigni
 Cast: Roberto Benigni, Nicolette Braschi, Giustino Durano,
Sergio Bustric, Marisa Parades, Horst Buchholz, Lydia Alfonis,
Giuliana Lojodice, Giorgio Cantarini
   What do women want?  The answer is furnished in a New
York Times magazine article that appeared on October 11,
which cites a poll taken among a large group of young Italian
women about the man with whom they would most want to
take a cruise.  Twenty percent chose Leonardo Di Caprio. 
Thirty percent picked Roberto Benigni.  Now, Leonardo Di
Caprio is cute as a button and, the word is, he's to make 25
million on his next picture.  Robert Benigni is scrawny,
balding, older, ungainly, and has nowhere near the wealth
that the youthful American possesses.  My conclusion? 
Money and looks are fine and will effect a following.  But what
a woman wants most is a man who can make her laugh.  
   Who better than Benigni?  He is Italy's foremost comedian, 
sometimes called the Robin Williams of his country, but in
movies like "Johnny Strecchino" and "Son of the Pink
Panther" is more attuned to the agility of Charlie Chaplin. 
Looking at him in his latest creation, "Life is Beautiful"--in
which he appears as the film's center and is its director and
co-writer--you'd swear he was the reincarnation of Mr. Chaplin
doing his own version of "The Great Dictator" but with a
headier mixture of pathos and burlesque.  Sometimes called
two movies in one, in that the first half is pure burlesque while
the latter segment mixes anguish with humor, "Life is
Beautiful" is unified by the realization that the Benigni in the
initial part is really no different from the man in the second: he
is merely putting his imagination into overdrive to protect the
family he loves so dearly.
   The title comes from one of Trotsky's writings as he
awaited impending death from one of Stalin's hit men: he said
he still believed that life is beautiful.  Benigni, in the role of the
father of a five-year-old boy who together with the boy and
the boy's mother is in a World War 2 concentration camp,
wants to hide the reality of the situation from the youngster, to
make his child believe throughout the ordeal that life remains
beautiful amid the inhumanity of the quarters.
   The first fifty minutes of the two-hour film is feather-light,
filled with physical and verbal comedy in equal amounts. It
includes one scene that is not only side-splitting but which
effectively satirizes the insane racial theories that were
guiding the Italian Fascists shortly after Mussolini signed a
pact of alliance with Hitler.  The initial scene sets the tone.  In
a case of mistaken identity Benigni (Guido) is traveling by car
down a road when the brakes give out.  Unable to stop he
virtually plows into a crowd of people who await the arrival of
their king and, as Guido tries to wave them away, his
gestures are interpreted by the adoring multitude as a
greeting, prompting them to return the display.  Soon
thereafter Dora (Nicolette Braschi--who appears in all of
Benigni's films), an upper-class woman engaged to a
pompous Fascist official, literally falls for Guido as though
from the sky. Through a series of meetings that Guido has
secretly planned, Dora pulls away from the arrogant official
and marries Guido, but not before he carries out one of the
picture's two hilarious scenes.  In yet another case of
mistaken identity, he is thought to be a Fascist dignitary
inspecting an elementary school and is expected to give the
assembled students some details on the new Aryan racial
theory that's all the rage.  Manipulating his gaunt body to the
hilt, Guido pretends that he is himself the perfect Aryan
specimen, possessing not only perfect ears but more
important the ideal belly button--which he demonstrates to the
open mouths of the assembled faculty, administrators and
kids.
   Some time later Guido, who now has a 5-year-old son,
Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini), is arrested and sent by train to a
concentration camp, while Dora, who is not Jewish, insists on
being deported along with her family.  Guido determines to
protect his son from the horrors that now face them by
pretending that the whole journey and incarceration is a game
with the ultimate prize a tank for the person who can
accumulate 1,000 points.  The games include points for
remaining silent, for hiding, for refusing to complain about the
lack of food.  When Giosue informs his father that the soldiers
intend to make soap and buttons out of them and to cook
them in an oven, Guido manages to laugh that off by showing
how absurd it would be to think that "this button is Francesco"
or "that piece of wood is a lawyer."  (Ironically enough, that
wildly unbelievable concept is perfectly true, a pathetic
testimonial to the way the most cultured nation in Europe
became engulfed in mass psychosis.)
   Nicoletta Braschi in no way has the depth as a performer
that the inordinately gifted Benigni enjoys and does not reflect
the sense of anguish or passion that would make her decision
voluntarily to go to the camp believable.  One supporting role
stands out, though; that of Horst Buchholz in the guise of a
German physician, Dr. Lessing, who was once a guest in an
Italian hotel and who struck up a friendship with Guido.  When
their situation has changed and Dr. Lessing finds himself a
German officer inspecting the prisoners for signs of disease,
he is severely conflicted almost to the point of a breakdown in
discovering that Guido is a prisoner there.  Little Giorgio
Cantarini's performance is nothing short of miraculous. 
Cantarini is wise well beyond his years, adopting the rhythm
of the role as though he were a puppet completely under the
dominion of his dad.  He winks at his father at appropriate
moments, ducks and hides as though he were a noble hound
reacting to the slightest wave of his master.  But he is
anything but an inanimate puppet, furnishing proof in scene
after scene of his unalterable love for his protective papa.
   "Life is Beautiful" does not show the true horrors of the
death camp as other anti-Nazi films have done.  The
prisoners are worked to the bone, starved, dispirited and
broken physically and spiritually.  Yet they seem to go to their
daily hard labors without a complaint and come "home" at
night tired but not genuinely frightened.  At no time does a
German officer so much as hit a prisoner, nor are there
frightening scenes of hangings.  Though the little boy does
not like the smell of the miserably overcrowded quarters, we
see no evidence of toilet problems.  In fact in one scene a
German appears positively cartoonish as he barks orders to
the inmates of the bunk in his own language, using Guido to
interpret.  Guido, further protecting his son from fright,
"translates" the commands into purely comic directives.
   What Benigni is after, then, is not yet another Holocaust
picture like "Schindler's List" but rather a fable-like invention
about the value of limitless family love in the face of
institutionalized madness.  Benigni is an original, carrying off
a task that no other filmmaker has realized in quite the same
way.  "Life is Beautiful" indeed deserves the host of prizes it
has garnered--the Grand Prix at the 1998 Cannes Film
Festival and the David di Donatello Awards (the Italian
Oscars) for Best Picture, Best Actor, Best Director and Best
Screenplay.  It's quite the style nowadays for filmmakers to
combine comedy with melodrama, but how many helmers can
successfully link physical comedy, parody, cultural
observations and the surreal as Benigni has just done?

Author
Joy Wyse
This is an Italian film, with subtitles.  Most people don't like
subtitles, but give this movie a try.  If it was in English, it would
probably be on everyone's best films list.  It seems almost sacrilegious
to say that this is a very funny movie, because it's such a moving drama. 
To me, it's a cross between `Saving Private Ryan' and `Schindler's List'
with humor.
The central character is a man named Guido, [portrayed by Roberto Benigni]
an Italian Jew who is always clowning around. [Benigni himself has been
lauded as a new Buster Keaton.] His story begins in 1939 when he comes to
the big city where he has an uncle.  There he meets a girl.  His courtship
is hysterical.  I keep remembering scene after scene, and laughing to
myself.   There are the `hat' scenes, and there is his job as a waiter. 
It is there that he meets a doctor who likes riddles.  They become an
intricate part of the plot.
 Suddenly, it is 1944 and the Germans have moved into Italy.  Previously,
the Italian Jews have suffered mainly bigotry, name-calling, and graffiti.
 But, the Germans begin to move them to the concentration camps.  Guido,
his uncle, his wife, and his young son are all shipped off.   Guido, in an
attempt to spare his son the trauma of what is happening, tells the boy
that they are on vacation, and that it's a game.  The boy loves his toy
tank, so Guido tells him that the first prize in this game is a full size
tank.  
Oh, there are so many wonderful moments, such as when the Grandmother
first meets her grandson.  I can hardly wait for this movie to be released
so that I can see it again.  And the sub-titles didn't bother me a bit. 
They are even beneficial and funny in the scene where the guard, in
German, is explaining the rules to the prisoners.
I cannot recommend this film too highly.  I give it an A-, and the minus
is only because of the language barrier.

Author
James Brundage
Written by Roberto Benigni and Vincezo Cerami
Starring Roberto Benigni, Nicolette Bruschi, Giustino Durano, Giorgio
Cantarini, Horst Buchholz
     I've been putting off this review for a long time.  I saw it at
Waterworks Cinemas in Pittsburgh about three weeks ago and haven't gotten
around to reviewing it until now: three days after it won several academy
awards.  Why?  Like with Saving Private Ryan, I have an incredible
difficulty having my words do justice to this film.
     Life is Beautiful centers around Guido (Roberto Benigni), a Jewish
waiter.  The first half, a hilarious and uplifting story, concerns his
wooing of Dora (Nicoltette Bruschi, real-life wife of Benigni), an
upper-class girl engaged to a man she does not love.  The second half, both
terribly sad and terribly joyous, concerns Guido's, Dora's, and their son
Joshua's internment at a death camp during WWII, during which Joshua is told
by his father that `it is all a game' in order to emotionally shield him
from the holocaust.
     In the opening of the movie, Benigni lets his comedic talents shine:
the first scene seems directly derived from the classic comic bit about the
brakes of a car failing, with a twist put in.  As the car speeds through a
village expecting the king and as Benigni tries to wave people out of the
way, they wave back, mistaking him for their ruler.  Very quickly the actual
plot appears, when Dora and Guido meet while they are fixing the car's
brakes at a farm.  Dora has been stung by a wasp on the leg and Guido
gallantly offers to suck the poison out.
     Watching these first scenes, you almost forget that the film's plot
concerns the holocaust.  Schindler's List bombarded you from frame one with
harsh imagery, giving you a generally depressed feeling about it, but Life
is Beautiful opts to take a comedic approach (no small effort) and makes you
feel good instead.  I would think that approach number two is the better one
(not to call judgment on a better film), for Schindler's List drowns you in
pessimism until the end, where as Life is Beautiful gives you a fair mix of
optimism and realistic pessimism.
     The first half showcases brilliant screenwriting as each joke is more
well-placed than the last, and often just as funny.  Benigni is willing to
do kid's humor of broken eggs in a hat, the adult humor of sucking the wasp'
s venom out, and the tongue-in-cheek humor that dots Benigni's conversations
with his uncle (Giustino Durano).  Benigni and Bruschi draw on past
collaboration with The Monster and Johnny Toothpick in order to create a
near-perfect bond between the two.
     When the film hits phase two it seems to take an abrupt turn to the
serious: the third scene you are greeted with has Joshua asking his father
why a sign says `No Jews or Dogs'.  Even then, Guido tries to shield his son
from the world around him by telling him that they just don't want Jews in
their shop or Dogs in their shop, promising to place a sign in his shop
tomorrow that says: `No Spiders or Visgoths.'
     The next day, Guido and Joshua are shipped off to the concentration
camp.  Dora, unwilling to leave her husband, demands to be put on the train
with them.  Even inside of the camp, Guido is unwilling to inform his son
that anything bad is happening.  He tells him instead that the camp is part
of an elaborate game.  The object is to get a thousand points and the winner
gets a real tank.
     Life is Beautiful is a strange contrast to the pessimism often seen in
movies.  For one, you love the characters so much that you want everything
good for them, despite the circumstances.  For two, you are given a positive
message to leave with instead of a negative one.  For three, the movie has
the ability to make you laugh, smile, and cry, both from tears of joy and
grief.  Make sure you see it.  If you can't watch it in theatres, then rent
it when it comes out, but see it.  See it because, as the movie will tell
you, life truly is beautiful

Author
Scott Renshaw
LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL (LA VITA 'E BELLA)
(Miramax)
Starring:  Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio Cantarini, Sergio
Bustric, Horst Buchholz.
Screenplay:  Robert Benigni and Vincenzo Cerami.
Producers:  Elda Ferri and Gianluigi Braschi.
Director:  Roberto Benigni
MPAA Rating:  PG-13 (adult themes)
Running Time:  114 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL, a fancifully dark Italian comedy from
co-writer/director/star Roberto Benigni, has inspired one of the most
misguided criticisms of recent years.  A large portion of the film, set in
Italy circa 1939-1945, involves an Italian family in a concentration camp:
Jewish bookseller Guido Orefice (Benigni); his Gentile wife Dora
(Nicoletta Braschi); and their five-year-old son Giosue (Giorgio
Cantarini).  In an effort to protect his son from the terrifying reality
of their situation, Guido convinces Giosue that they are playing a grand
game, collecting points for being quiet or remaining hidden.  When German
soldiers arrive at the bunkhouse to announce the camp rules, Guido feigns
being able to translate into Italian so he can announce the rules of the
"game" to Giosue; when Giosue hears stories of the evils going on at the
camp, Guido laughingly dismisses them as the attempts of other "players"
to gain a psychological advantage.
     The criticism leveled at LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL is that it is a sanitized
version of the Holocaust, which somehow diminishes the gravity of the
tragedy by squeezing humor from it.  The absurdity of that criticism is
that it seems to miss the point entirely.  Guido's entire purpose in the
second half of the film becomes sanitizing the Holocaust, turning the
experience into something his son can survive both physically and
emotionally.  Benigni crafts a sensitive relationship between the father
and son, as Guido's wit and imagination allow him to create a world of
pleasure and hope where no pleasure or hope should be possible.  There are
more than enough grim reminders of the camp's true purpose -- as well as a
glimpse of banal evil in the character of an obliviously self-absorbed
physician (Horst Buchholz) -- to dismiss any notion that Benigni as a
film-maker is candy-coating one of the bleakest chapters in human history.
His character, however, is doing exactly that; his success is a triumph of
love and determination in the creation of their own reality.
     The irony of that misguided criticism is that there's a much simpler
reason to be less than dazzled by LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL -- namely, most of the
first hour.  In essence, it's an _extremely_ extended prologue,
introducing us to Guido as a carefree seeker of love and fortune who
directs his creative energies towards winning Dora's heart.  The pleasant
scenes between them certainly establish their bond, as well as Guido's
imaginative gifts, but on their own they're fairly innocuous bits of
romantic tomfoolery.  Benigni mixes physical comedy with the occasional
social commentary, all with moderate success and the sense that he's just
passing time until he can get to the real meat of the story.  It's easy to
imagine Benigni setting up all the necessary relationships in about half
the time, making the shift in tone less abrupt...and making shifting in
your seat less necessary.
     None of that detracts from the potent, bittersweet pleasures of the
film's second half.  All of the things that could have gone wrong instead
go right -- the young Cantarini radiates charming innocence without
cloying self-awareness; Benigni hits just the right balance between clown
and unlikely hero; the darker moments always feel consistent with the
human comedy.  LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL grows richer by the minute, making it
easy to forgive the amiable but meandering first half. If it hadn't takeng
quite so long to reach its most powerful scenes, LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL would
have been an easy choice as one of the year's best films.  An expression
as trite as "triumph of the human spirit" doesn't quite do justice to what
Benigni has pulled off here.  He has taken pure horror and turned it into
a whimsical love story -- between a man and a woman, between a man and his
son, between a man and the idea that we never lose the capacity to create
beauty in our lives.

Author
Steve Rhodes
Little Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini), around 4 years old, is locked up in a
Nazi concentration camp, but he doesn't mind. It's a fun place to be,
what with the contests and all. If he and his father, Guido (Roberto
Benigni), can amass enough points for proper behavior, they can win the
grand prize -- their very own armored tank.
Welcome to the wild and wacky world of writer, director and actor
Roberto Benigni as he takes a comic's eye view of the Holocaust in LIFE
IS BEAUTIFUL (LA VITA E BELLA).
(This is the second time in two days that I've screened motion pictures
with a Holocaust theme. Yesterday's screening had Stephen King using it
as the subject for a horror picture in APT PUPIL. And today's LIFE IS
BEAUTIFUL takes a humorous view of the same topic. Personally, I much
prefer the serious treatment it got in THE LONG WAY HOME that I saw a
couple of weeks ago.)
Regardless of how it sounds, Roberto Benigni, one of Italy's favorite
funnymen, treats the biggest tragedy of this century with respect. The
film, thank goodness, moves away from its slapstick first hour to a
poignant second that is its salvation.
Starting just before the outbreak of the Second World War, the movie
shows Fascist Italy in its most handsome light. The sets are sumptuous,
the gowns are elegant and the cinematography stunning. The jokes,
however, are such old-fashioned slapstick that they are almost never
funny. Eggs accidentally breaking on unsuspecting heads and dresses
inadvertently ripped by clumsy feet are such old sight gags that it is
hard for them to even generate smiles, much less laughs.
The good-spirited film tries hard, perhaps too hard, to charm its
audience. It works so hard at being cute that it forgets to be funny.
Eventually the zany style of the first part gives way to the serious
second part when Guido, his wife Dora (Nicoletta Braschi), and their son
Giosue are send to a Nazi concentration camp. It is there that Guido
hides his son and invents the prize cover-up to mask the hopelessness of
their situation. Even in the camp, Guido still hams it up to keep up his
son's spirits.
The movie's relentlessly happy music will put you in such a pleasant
mood that the scenes of the "shower" changing rooms may seem almost
harmless. And the Nazis appear a lot nicer than they usually do. Rather
than burning Jewish shops, they paint one of their horses a bright lime
green and put the words "Achtung Jewish Horse" on it.
Fans of the Roberto Benigni brand of physical humor will undoubtedly
love LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL. Others may want more.
LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL runs 2:02. The film is in Italian with English
subtitles. It is rated PG-13 for holocaust-related thematic elements and
would be fine for kids around 12 and up.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
"Average Joe" Barlow
STARRING:  Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giorgio
                Cantarini, Horst Buchholz, Sergio Bustric
DIRECTOR:  Roberto Benigni
WRITERS:   Roberto Benigni and Vincenzo Cerami
RATED:     PG-13
RELEASED:  1997 (1988 in the USA, subtitled)
        Roberto Benigni's "Life is Beautiful" is the sort of film
which exemplifies the power of cinema: it's art without pretension,
hope without fear, dreams without restrictions.  Although it has been
criticized as a sanitization of the Holocaust, the movie pulls no
emotional punches; by sharing the hardships and joy of the characters,
we are reminded just how precious and remarkable the human spirit is.
        It's 1939 Italy, and Guido Orefice (Benigni) is a pleasant,
amiable waiter who works in a restaurant owned by his uncle.
Clever and impulsive, Guido uses humor as an ally while serving his
customers, making him well-liked, especially by Dr. Lessing (Horst
Buchholz), a German who shares Guido's fondness for puns and riddles.
Their relationship is particularly intriguing, as Guido is Jewish.
        When a chance meeting with the lovely Dora (Nicoletta
Braschi, Benigni's real-life spouse) sets his heart aflutter, Guido
goes to great lengths to win her love, despite her engagement to
a snooty government official.  Their mutual affection gradually
deepens into something more, culminating in a wonderful scene in
which Guido disrupts Dora's engagement party to whisk her away on
horseback.  It's here that a more conventional film would end... but
there's nothing conventional about "Life is Beautiful," and this scene
occurs less than halfway through the story.
        Flash forward six years to 1945: Guido and Dora are happily
married, and are now parents to a five-year old son named Giosue'
(Giorgio Cantarini).  Fortune has been good to them: Guido even owns
the bookstore he's always wanted!  But Guido's Jewish heritage is
discovered by a facist-filled government, and he and his son are sent
to an unidentified concentration camp.  Dora, a Gentile, is not
required to attend the camp, but she demands to go with her family;
her devotion to her husband and child is that selfless.
        Young Giosue' is frightened, but it's here that Guido
gives his greatest performance, convincing his son that they are
embarking on a grand adventure, an epic game that will be exciting
and fun.  (The prize for winning the game?  A full-size tank!)  Guido
knows that the Nazi officers who run the camp are looking for reasons
to dispose of the prisoners, so he tells Giosue' that he (Giosue') can
win extra points for hiding, remaining silent for long periods of
time, etc.  These are poignant scenes, as father and son rekindle each
other's enthusiasm and optimism (Dora is in a different part of the
segregated camp).  Although the other children in the camp are
gradually disappearing into the camp's gas chambers, Guido uses humor
to keep his son oblivious to their fate, sparing Giosue' from the
emotional agony and sense of helplessness that he himself is feeling.
        The structure of "Life is Beautiful" is somewhat like Robert
Rodriguez's "From Dusk Til Dawn," in the sense that each half of
the film has a completely different tone, joined together by a
startlingly abrupt transition.  It's ingenious and effective: both
halves of the movie are masterfully constructed, but as different as
night and day.  The warm, sunny first half establishes these wonderful
characters and their relationships; we see Guido's remarkable
personality in full-swing, and witness the passion and joy he derives
from simple, ordinary activities.  These early moments also set up
his fairy-tale love affair with Dora (Guido refers to her as his
"princess" throughout the story), and their devotion to each other is
made clear-- we understand why she is willing to follow Guido to a
concentration camp.  The story's second half, by contrast, uses their
love as a foundation on which to build triumph and tragedy.  The
construction is as elegant as any I've encoutered.
        It's impossible not to like Benigni's warm portrayl of Guido,
the sort of clown who inspires laughter as much by accident as
deliberate effort; his mannerisms are so broad and cartoonish that
comparisons with Chaplin are justified.  Benigni, who not only
starred but also directed and co-wrote the screenplay, has a
masterful sense of comedic timing.  The material flows effortlessly
through him, lending both spontaneity to the gags and power to the
drama.
        Benigni doesn't skimp on the humor, despite the subject
matter; even during the horrific scenes inside the camp, Guido is
full of life and optimism-- a veritable beacon of hope and sunshine
for his fellow prisoners and, most importantly, his son.  There are
those who have called the film "offensive" because of the way it
handles its Holocaust-related material.  They are mistaken: this movie
isn't *about* the Holocaust; it's about humanity, love, and the
desperate facade one man must invent to spare mental anguish for
his son while suffering *through* the Holocaust.
        There are perhaps ten genuine laugh-out-loud moments in
"Life is Beautiful," sprinkled in among the tragedy; like the
characters in the film, Guido's antics make the despair bearable for
us, right up to the movie's final moments, which involve the triumph
of the human spirit over the unimaginable forces of adversity.  The
film soars, heartens, saddens, uplifts, rejoices... and, like life, is
beautiful indeed.

E-Mail: jbarlow@earthling.net
Joe Barlow on Film:  http://www.ipass.net/~jbarlow/film.htm
If you'd like to receive new film reviews by e-mail, please
write to the above address and ask to be put on my mailing
list.  Or, you can subscribe directly from my web page.
-----------== Posted via Deja News, The Discussion Network ==----------
http://www.dejanews.com/       Search, Read, Discuss, or Start Your Own    

Author
Mac VerStandig
Life is Beautiful (La Vita e Bella) is an example of a good movie that 
people have decided to make great. Do not be mistaken, it is not the 
best foreign fare of 1998, nor even close to the finest (my personal 
favorite being the Iranian Taste of Cherry). But the movie is a solid 
work and wholesome reminder of the Holocaust. The film follows a father 
and son through a concentration camp, and shows the father's attempts to 
ease the son's pain by convincing him it is all an elaborate game. 
Roberto Benigni won best actor for this production, just one of many 
undeserved awards that the movie garnered. Yet, the work is still leaps 
and bounds superior to the recent Jakob the Liar and the best Italian 
film to make it across the Atlantic since the 1994 romantic masterpiece, 
Il Postino.

Author
David Wilcock
Starring Roberto Benigni and Nicoletta Braschi
Directed By Roberto Benigni
Running Time: 1 hour 54 minutes.
Only the Italians could create a love story set against the holocaust, and
make it as wonderful and enjoyable as this. Benigni plays Guido, a Jewish
bookstore owner who falls in love with Dora (Braschi.) However, this is
during the period of Nazi Germany, and Guido, Dora, their son Giosue
(Giorgio Cantarini) and Uncle (Giustino Durano) end up at a concentration
camp. We follow their adventures there, as Benigni turns the camp into a
'game' to Giosue, an he tries to reunite himself with his wife.
This film is truly great. Benigni gives a performance with a childlike spark
that is so perfect and uplifting it puts a big smile on your face. From the
jaunty comedy start to the heart breaking end, Benigni is full of warmth,
charm and appeal. Having also written the screenplay himself, I imagine he
performed the character just the way he wanted it, and it is perfect.
Braschi isn't quite as strong as his wife, but she is still memorable, even
if she does pale to the complete charm and energy of Benigni. Cantarini is
an absolute delight, a wonderfully talented young actor who deserves to go
on to much better things. He also gets an hugely up lifting scene at the end
which has to be to be believed and cherished.
The screenplay is great, if a little underwhelming at first. This is mainly
because the first hour or so is a big set up for the main plot. Consisting
of little romantic vignettes, it's still a comic delight, and the change of
tone from whimsical romance to the horrors of the holocaust is so well
handled by Benigni, it's seamless. In fact, you could almost forget it's set
against the holocaust, if the film was not to remind you of all the horrors,
such as the gas chamber. But the film has a bubbly charm that nearly offsets
this. It may feel strange laughing through the holocaust, but Benigni sure
makes it feel good.
It's impossible to describe how enjoyable this film is. I could write
paragraphs about how the energetic writing, directing, acting and even minor
details such as the music and production design make this film a delight,
but it wouldn't do the film justice. Benigni knows exactly what makes the
audience tick, and exploits us completely. It's never too schmaltzy, it's
never too depressing, it's just the right mix of whimsy and horror. The
greatest achievement is that Benigni has created such as uplifting film
about one of the scariest atrocities of the decade. Witty, surprising, fast
paced and a triumph, Life is Beautiful is an instant classic. Do not miss
out.

Author
Marty Mapes
**** (out of 4) LA VITA É BELLA (LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL) is a lightweight
drama. Directed by and starring one of Italy's greatest living comics,
it naturally contains some comic scenes. I mention these facts up-front
because they become interesting once you know that half the film is set
in a Nazi prison camp.
Mixing humor and concentration camps is audacious, and it has stirred a
healthy amount of controversy. Some say that the very idea cheapens the
memory of those who lost their lives. Frankly, it's hard to argue with
that point of view. If you can't forgive a movie for attempting such a
combination, you should skip it.
However, if you're willing to be open, Benigni handles the mix very
well. By focusing on the bond between father and son, and only drawing a
sketchy picture of the horrible life of Jewish prisoners, Benigni moved
and shrunk the target for criticism, and he allowed the small human
story to bloom.
The movie begins like any other light romantic drama. It is Italy,
before the war. Guido (Benigni) is a waiter with a penchant for riddles.
He is in love with a woman whom he's met only once. Through a series of
coincidences (some of them arranged) he finally gets to know Dora
(Nicoletta Braschi), the woman of his dreams.
Guido learns that Dora, a schoolteacher, is already promised to someone
"better," someone with more prestige and money than him. Nevertheless,
he persists in pursuing her affections.
Guido's charm is amazing. In one of the finest comic set pieces on film,
several gags, which have been set up over about 20 minutes of screen
time, are paid off, one by one, all to impress a beautiful girl. The
effect marvelous, both for the audience and for Dora.
One evening at a party, the cheerful harmony of the film starts to
shift. A horse of Guido's uncle has been painted bright green with
anti-Semitic slogans. A handful of partygoers, interested in the new
German situation, talk casually about mathematical word problems
involving money saved by executing cripples. Nevertheless, the film's
melody remains bright, for this is the night that Guido finally captures
Dora's heart, her soul, and her body.
The film cuts forward in time. Italy has changed drastically, especially
for Italian Jews. Guido now has a son, to whom he teaches meekness in
the face of repressive Italian authority. Meekness is life. The
alternative is death. And as the title reminds us, life - any life - is
beautiful.
Although he doesn't deal with the mistreatment of Jews as a whole,
Benigni shows how institutionalized racism affected a single ordinary
man. On their way home one day Guido and his son Giosué (Girogio
Cantarini) encounter a storefront sign that says "No Jews or Dogs."
How would you explain this sign, not as a historian, but as a father to
your son? How do you tell him what it means without blackening his
heart? Guido not only answers his son's questions, he does it in a way
that removes them from the cruelty, and elevates them above their cold
reality. In addition, it illustrates for the audience how childish the
sign really is.
Needless to say, the sign was a sign of worse things to come. It isn't
long before Guido and his son are shipped off to a prison camp. Now
instead of a single insulting sign, Guido has a whole world, an entire
reality, to explain away.
In this last half of the film, Guido tries desperately to come up with
an elaborate explanation of their situation. They are not in a prison
camp, they are playing an extended game. There are rules, opponents, and
points earned for bravery and for not talking. If they can only earn
1,000 points, they will win a tank and get to go home.  
The real heart of the movie is that Guido doesn't see anything fun about
his "game." He loves his son so much that he will risk everything, not
just to protect his body, but to protect his mind and soul as well. The
task is overwhelming, and it seems doomed to failure, but Guido refuses
to quit.
It is this indomitable struggle for some tiny shred of goodness and
hope, in the face of an overwhelming evil, that makes this film so
moving.
Benigni is great in the role of Guido. He knows that fighting the
situation head-on is futile. All he can do is smirk at the absurdity of
the Nazi ideology. But Benigni is careful never to laugh too hard, and
he never pretends he can fight head-on as a prisoner. He plays the part
with an ironic resignation that is perfect for this film.
This film has stirred resentment and disdain in some critics. That a
light, often humorous drama is set in a Nazi prison camp are an
unacceptable mix, they say. Others blame the director for deliberately
using that combination to push buttons and pull strings.
While I wouldn't argue with them - I don't think I could say anything to
change their minds - I do disagree. To the first objection I would say
that Benigni has as much right to set a story in a prison camp as any
other filmmaker. While his depiction wasn't as grim or graphic as in
other films, he still handled the setting with an appropriate gravity.
To the second objection, I would say: let your buttons be pushed and
your strings be pulled. Why else do we go to movies if not to be moved?
Giving myself to the film, I was rewarded with one of the most moving
and crushing films in years. Though I often cry at movies, I rarely lose
control. LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL, and its simple message that life - any life
- is beautiful, nearly succeeded.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Steve Kong
Life is Beautiful is two films in one. The first part is a lighthearted
comedy and the second is a dark and depressing look at the Holocaust. It's
too bad that director/actor/writer Roberto Benigni wasn't able to split
this movie into two different films. While a substantive film, Life is
Beautiful leads the viewers down one path and then transports them to
another going in the opposite direction.
During the lighthearted and often hilarious first hour of the film we get
the setup and the background of the film. Guido (Benigni) is an Italian
countryman who moves to the big city. He dreams of opening a bookstore. On
the way to the city he bumps into a beautiful woman, Dora (Nicoletta
Braschi) for whom he falls madly in love with. Guido ultimately wins the
heart of Dora and they are married. As the first hour ends, the mood and
tone of the film changes abruptly. The audience who has been laughing
during this first hour is suddenly taken into a more morose hour.
Five years later Guido and Dora are still happily married and are raising
their five-year-old son. Plus, Guido has finally gotten his bookstore. Not
all is well in Italy though. The Nazi's have taken more of the country and
the political atmosphere is not the best  especially for the Jews, as is
pointed out by a sign hanging on a shop window that reads, "No Jews or dogs
allowed." The pinnacle of the Nazi infestation of Italy finally takes its
toll on the family. Guido, his wife, and son are taken to a concentration
camp. It is here that the movie turns dark and depressing.
When someone falls, it hurts much more when they fall from a higher place.
Benigni does just this to the audience, intentionally or not, by starting
out lighthearted and then going dark. The lightheartedness of the first
hour brings the audience up high and then as we go into the second hour
Benigni just lets the audience fall. For me, I could have done without this
switch in tone, which made the film all that much more depressing. And
although Guido is constantly the clownish man trying to keep his son happy
in the concentration camp, there is always a sense of dread hanging in the
air during the second hour.
What would have been better would have been to split this movie into two
complete films. Although the first part of the film is there to set
everything up, it could have been a good romantic comedy. And the second
half of the film is a deep and touching Holocaust film that would have made
more of an impact standing alone. Together, though, these two parts make
for a film that misleads you to start and then puts you on a sad track
afterwards. Ultimately, the film is about the strength that comes from the
human spirit and the sacrifices that people make during their times of
suffering.
The one standout thing about Life is Beautiful is the film's score. The
score by Nicola Piovani is excellent with one of the most memorable themes
I've heard lately. It is light when it needs to be and powerful when the
time comes. And never is the score overpowering. Kudos to Piovani for this
wonderful film score.
Don't Miss Life is Beautiful, but be forewarned that this is a pretty bleak
film. I didn't get this warning ahead of time and I am still quite
depressed after my screening of the film.
 a guy with a helluva attitude that loves the cinema.
 i'm your hard boiled movie guide.

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: October 23, 1998
Starring: Roberto Benigni, Nicoletta Braschi, Giustino Durano, Sergio
Bini Bustric, Horst Bucholz
Directed by: Roberto Benigni
Distributed by: Miramax Films
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (holocaust-related thematic elements) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1999/lifeisbeaut.htm
The love for family is one of the strongest driving forces in any man's
life, especially for those who have fostered their family under
precarious circumstances. Thematically in cinema, love for family has
been used frequently and emphatically to highlight more abstract aspects
of characters; it is rare, however, for it to develop as outstandingly
as it does in Roberto Benigni's neo-classic drama, LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL.
Through a central cast of father, mother, and son, Benigni demonstrates
the wonderful, undying love that a family shares in the best of times
and the worst of times. 
Life *is* beautiful for Guido Orefice (Roberto Benigni, directing
himself here for the sixth time in his career), an Italian Jew, master
con man, and aspiring waiter extraordinaire. Living in 1930's Italy, he
lives a carefree life of good fortune; it is made even better when he
happens upon a pretty schoolteacher named Dora (Nicoletta Braschi).
Although Dora is already engaged, Guido manages to sweep her off her
feet and persuades her to marry him instead; the two have a child named
Joshua (Giorgio Cantarini). Unfortunately for the happy family, the
Third Reich and its Nazi minions occupy Italy and imprison all Jews in
work camps. 
It is after the movie takes this dramatic turn that the movie's theme of
family love becomes the strongest. Although prior to this turning point
Benigni plays Guido with a sort of goofy charm, he relaxes the role to
ensure his son's happiness. Now, instead of awkwardly seducing the sweet
Dora, he constantly reassures his son that everything will be all right.
Benigni's performance is truly a well-rounded one, and certainly one of
the more fluid turns all year. 
The supports are all strong as well, but the movie truly excels in its
script. LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL is a self-proclaimed fable, one which tells
its story in grand, two-part fashion. In certain parts it manages to
sink to the level of a "Saturday Night Live" spinoff -- a number of
humorous skits connected by a token plot -- but in the movie's second
half the script's circular nature becomes admirably obvious. Characters
make reprise appearances in fine form, and certain events which are
intially curious become critically linked to the plot's outcome. 
In all, fans of foreign film will see this as a memorable motion
picture, and novice movie-watchers may take this opportunity to see
their first "artsy" film. LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL is an artsy movie by
convention but easily accessible to everyone, and above all is a fine
thematic picture. 

Author
Ryan Ellis
give me a buzz on the ol' e-lines, iluvmick@hotmail.com
As Charlie Chaplin's classic "City Lights" told us, smile
though your heart is breaking, smile even though it's aching. And
if you can entertain your kid while you're at it, all the better.
Roberto Benigni's Italian film of a man's love for his family is
up for some of the high-profile Academy Awards (Best Picture,
Best Director, Best Actor, etc.), but it's just a notch below the
competition. The brilliance and star-power of both "Saving
Private Ryan" and "Shakespeare In Love" will probably relegate
"Life Is Beautiful" to winning lesser, yet still significant,
awards (Best Foreign Language Film, for example.)
As writer, director, and charismatic star of this Italian
comedy/drama, Benigni has created a remarkable character who
never loses sight of what's important to him. He's also written a
multi-dimensional script that takes us on an unexpected journey
through war-torn Europe during World War II. The first half of
the film is almost entirely comedy as Guido Orefice (Benigni)
meets his dream woman, Dora (Nicoletta Brashci), and keeps
running into her on purpose. Also working as a waiter, the
aspiring bookshop owner makes plenty of friends with his wit and
plenty of enemies with his irreverance.
The second half of the film takes a mild turn toward drama,
but, as I said, it doesn't lose its way. Guido and Dora
consummate their love and flash-forward to a few years later when
young Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini) is born. After years of marital
happiness, Dora returns home one day to find that Guido, his
uncle (Giustino Durano), and Giosue have been captured and
imprisoned in a Nazi concentration camp. She asks the Nazis to
take her, too. Although the family can't be together (she's kept
in a separate women's camp), they don't lose hope that they'll be
together again.
The boy doesn't understand why they've been thrown into such
a place, so to keep him from panicking or even being gassed to
death (as children were in the camps), Guido makes it into a
game. He tells Giosue that they will be given a real tank if they
win the game. He makes up rules that will keep the kid safe if he
follows them. His antics are funny and the adorable boy falls for
it, thinking he and his father will win first prize if they
accumulate 1000 points. Ah, ignorance is bliss. If only everyone
who'd been placed in those horrible concentration camps could
have kept such a hopeful heart...
Man, it's hard to write about the holocaust. Such a hateful
display of politics and inhumanity is awful to imagine and
difficult to write about even in 1999. However, Benigni doesn't
allow his audience to brood over the horrors of WWII too long. He
keeps our spirits up when he entertains his son. I can't remember
smiling and feeling so terrible simultaneously in quite this way
before. I was both the boy AND his father during the final hour
of the film. I was scared for their lives and giggling at the
whoppers he would tell his son to keep him from knowing the
hideous truth. If all parents lied to their kids for such good,
loving reasons, maybe the global crime rates wouldn't be so
brutally high. Yes, I'm preaching, but parents can learn
something from this film about raising their kids under the worst
possible strain. So the Jeep stalls on the way to violin lessons,
tough noogies! It's easier than dragging anvils around all day
and then struggling to convince your son that the worst thing
that could happen is they won't win this supposed game. Sorry, no
more preaching...
Benigni is a naturally gifted artist. He occasionally evokes
the immortal Charlie Chaplin, which may be high praise, but it's
worthy praise. As director, he uses his supporting cast extremely
well, allowing many of their paths to cross in poignant or
humourous ways. As lead actor, he is excellent, but will be
hard-pressed to pry the Oscar away from Ian McKellan or Nick
Nolte. Still, his character is as well-developed as those and
he's more likable.
The film's conclusion is not spectacular or unexpected, but
it's quite emotional all the same. These characters are simple
and real and we fall in love with them. The film builds up and
becomes more enthralling as time ticks by. It's not quite
perfect, but "Life is Beautiful" is a unique piece of
story-telling. Once they draw you in, not even having to read
subtitles seems to be a chore. After all, if Guido can smile
though his heart is breaking, so can we.
USELESS TRIVIA--I'd like to have some, but I have no useless
trivia for this heart-felt movie.


Author
Walter Frith
Like 1987's 'Hope and Glory', much of the unpleasantness of war in 'Life
is Beautiful' is seen through the eyes of a child.  In reality, this
film isn't really about war as much as it is about one man's way of
dealing with it and finding enough humour to entertain his young son
throughout it all.  This film is the ultimate testament to the spirit of
the human condition in that its protagonist never waivers in the face of
tragedy, something that would be very easy to do, and he always finds a
way to make things seem good during a bad situation.
Italy's Roberto Benigni has made a truly classic film that details
family life in the simplest of texts and how the separation of it often
makes the heart grow fonder.  He is Oscar bound in several mainstream
categories, including Best Actor and Best Director, co-author of the
Best Original Screenplay and the film will almost certainly be nominated
for Best Picture and at the very least, Best Foreign Language Film
which, and if it is, it will be a hands down winner.
It opens in the pleasant countryside of Italy in 1939, just prior to the
outbreak of World War II.  Guido (Roberto Benigni) is a happy go lucky
fellow.  Never taking time to breathe between interludes of spreading
life's good cheer among his friends, relatives and anyone else who'll
listen.  He aspires to open a bookshop and meets a beautiful young
school teacher ((Nicoletta Braschi, who is Benigni's real life wife). 
He keeps running into her time after time and their partnership in life
seems almost set by destiny.  They marry and the film fast forwards to
1945 and they now have a five year old son (Giorgio Cantarini).  
Benigni's character is an Italian Jew, and he, along with his uncle and
son are rounded up by the Nazis and put into a concentration camp.  The
strong love his wife has for him and her son has her demanding to be
taken to the camp as well, and even though she is not forced to go, this
is one of the film's most memorable moments.  Throughout their time in
the camp, Guido tells his son that all the chores, hard ship and
suffering are a game and that the winner will receive a tank for first
prize when its all over.  Naturally, you can't tell a five year old boy,
if you have any human feelings, that you could be murdered at any minute
and this whole whimsical premise casts a new light on war that I've
never seen before and the film never makes you feel bad for a moment and
is as important, in many ways, as any film that details the horrors of
war strongly enough to repel an audience.
This is actually like two movies in one because the first half is
strictly about free civilian life and it plays almost like a one man
show as Benigni's character practically puts on a one man show.  The
jokes are slapstick like in many ways but the wit of the film's dialogue
and how it relates in resolving things is a marvel to behold.  The
second half of the film is the concentration camp suffering.  The ending
should be sad, but it isn't because its balance is intact throughout its
entire running time and you can't take your eyes off the screen for a
moment.    
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Marty Mapes
**** (out of 4) LA VITA É BELLA (LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL) is a lightweight
drama. Directed by and starring one of Italy's greatest living comics,
it naturally contains some comic scenes. I mention these facts up-front
because they become interesting once you know that half the film is set
in a Nazi prison camp.
Mixing humor and concentration camps is audacious, and it has stirred a
healthy amount of controversy. Some say that the very idea cheapens the
memory of those who lost their lives. Frankly, it's hard to argue with
that point of view. If you can't forgive a movie for attempting such a
combination, you should skip it.
However, if you're willing to be open, Benigni handles the mix very
well. By focusing on the bond between father and son, and only drawing a
sketchy picture of the horrible life of Jewish prisoners, Benigni moved
and shrunk the target for criticism, and he allowed the small human
story to bloom.
The movie begins like any other light romantic drama. It is Italy,
before the war. Guido (Benigni) is a waiter with a penchant for riddles.
He is in love with a woman whom he's met only once. Through a series of
coincidences (some of them arranged) he finally gets to know Dora
(Nicoletta Braschi), the woman of his dreams.
Guido learns that Dora, a schoolteacher, is already promised to someone
"better," someone with more prestige and money than him. Nevertheless,
he persists in pursuing her affections.
Guido's charm is amazing. In one of the finest comic set pieces on film,
several gags, which have been set up over about 20 minutes of screen
time, are paid off, one by one, all to impress a beautiful girl. The
effect marvelous, both for the audience and for Dora.
One evening at a party, the cheerful harmony of the film starts to
shift. A horse of Guido's uncle has been painted bright green with
anti-Semitic slogans. A handful of partygoers, interested in the new
German situation, talk casually about mathematical word problems
involving money saved by executing cripples. Nevertheless, the film's
melody remains bright, for this is the night that Guido finally captures
Dora's heart, her soul, and her body.
The film cuts forward in time. Italy has changed drastically, especially
for Italian Jews. Guido now has a son, to whom he teaches meekness in
the face of repressive Italian authority. Meekness is life. The
alternative is death. And as the title reminds us, life - any life - is
beautiful.
Although he doesn't deal with the mistreatment of Jews as a whole,
Benigni shows how institutionalized racism affected a single ordinary
man. On their way home one day Guido and his son Giosué (Girogio
Cantarini) encounter a storefront sign that says "No Jews or Dogs."
How would you explain this sign, not as a historian, but as a father to
your son? How do you tell him what it means without blackening his
heart? Guido not only answers his son's questions, he does it in a way
that removes them from the cruelty, and elevates them above their cold
reality. In addition, it illustrates for the audience how childish the
sign really is.
Needless to say, the sign was a sign of worse things to come. It isn't
long before Guido and his son are shipped off to a prison camp. Now
instead of a single insulting sign, Guido has a whole world, an entire
reality, to explain away.
In this last half of the film, Guido tries desperately to come up with
an elaborate explanation of their situation. They are not in a prison
camp, they are playing an extended game. There are rules, opponents, and
points earned for bravery and for not talking. If they can only earn
1,000 points, they will win a tank and get to go home.  
The real heart of the movie is that Guido doesn't see anything fun about
his "game." He loves his son so much that he will risk everything, not
just to protect his body, but to protect his mind and soul as well. The
task is overwhelming, and it seems doomed to failure, but Guido refuses
to quit.
It is this indomitable struggle for some tiny shred of goodness and
hope, in the face of an overwhelming evil, that makes this film so
moving.
Benigni is great in the role of Guido. He knows that fighting the
situation head-on is futile. All he can do is smirk at the absurdity of
the Nazi ideology. But Benigni is careful never to laugh too hard, and
he never pretends he can fight head-on as a prisoner. He plays the part
with an ironic resignation that is perfect for this film.
This film has stirred resentment and disdain in some critics. That a
light, often humorous drama is set in a Nazi prison camp are an
unacceptable mix, they say. Others blame the director for deliberately
using that combination to push buttons and pull strings.
While I wouldn't argue with them - I don't think I could say anything to
change their minds - I do disagree. To the first objection I would say
that Benigni has as much right to set a story in a prison camp as any
other filmmaker. While his depiction wasn't as grim or graphic as in
other films, he still handled the setting with an appropriate gravity.
To the second objection, I would say: let your buttons be pushed and
your strings be pulled. Why else do we go to movies if not to be moved?
Giving myself to the film, I was rewarded with one of the most moving
and crushing films in years. Though I often cry at movies, I rarely lose
control. LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL, and its simple message that life - any life
- is beautiful, nearly succeeded.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Kevin Patterson
Roberto Benigni's LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL takes "dark comedy" to entirely new
levels. It is clearly a humorous film, making good use of Benigni's comic
talents, yet nearly half of it takes place in a Nazi concentration camp,
and it does have something very worthwhile to say about the Holocaust. At
its roots, this is a story about how someone who is leading a relatively
peaceful, ordinary life suddenly has it stripped away, and how such a
person struggles to make sense out of the unimaginable human cruelty that
he witnesses. It just so happens that this character is Guido Orefice, an
Italian Jewish waiter who seems like he must have once been a circus clown
and is frankly a little nuts.
For the first hour, we are introduced to Guido and his life in 1939
Italy--after Mussolini's takeover, but before the worst days of World War
II and the Holocaust--as he meets and falls in love with Dora (Nicoletta
Braschi), a grade school teacher. Guido is able to live a happy life for
the most part. So far, his freedom has not been curtailed very strictly. He
can't quite consider himself equal to the non-Semitic Italian citizens, but
it's mostly limited to passing insults and subtle forms of discrimination.
Benigni is a talented actor, and he succeeds at getting us to like Guido
and his friends through his various bizarre stunts and comic routines,
while at the same time showing the audience the creeping inhuman racism
that is becoming more and more a part of everyday life in Italy. Then we
jump forward to 1944. He and Dora are married, and they have a young son
named Giosue (Giorgio Cantarini). But Italy is a slightly more threatening
place now. Armed troops patrol the streets day and night, and few people
will shop at the bookstore that Guido now operates because he is Jewish.
Suddenly, one day the German army arrives and puts an abrupt end to the
life they once knew: the order has come down for Guido and Giosue to be
arrested and taken to a concentration camp. Dora is exempt since she isn't
Jewish, but when she learns what happens, she finds the train that they are
on and insists to the Nazis that she be taken to the same camp. When they
arrive there, Guido can't bring himself to explain to Giosue what's
happening. How, after all, do you tell a 5-year-old that an insane racist
dictator has decided that he is a sub-human because he is Jewish, or that
he now lives in a place where the tiniest transgression probably means
death in a gas chamber or a crematorium? So, instead, Guido tells Giosue
that they are playing a strange sort of game, with all kinds of rules that
lead to either addition or subtraction of points. Hiding from the guards
earns you a lot of points, while crying or being hungry or wanting your
mother will cost you quite a few. Whenever Giosue comes close to realizing
what's really going on, Guido invents another set of rules to explain it,
or tells him that the other prisoners are making things up to try to get
him to lose points.
LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL has been criticized by some who claim that it makes a
joke of the Holocaust. The thing I realized as I watched the film, however,
is that--and I'll explain this as carefully as possible so as to avoid
offending anyone--in a way, the Holocaust *is* a joke. Certainly an
unimaginably cruel one, and not one that really makes you laugh, but
nevertheless a joke in that it is fundamentally absurd and ridiculous. In
one scene that is simultaneously hilarious and sad, the guards ask who
among the prisoners knows German, because they want to explain the camp's
regulations to the Italian prisoners. Guido, not wanting Giosue to hear the
real regulations, claims he can speak German and proceeds to translate the
guard's instructions with things like, "We play the parts of the big mean
guys who scream all the time. Avoiding us gets you 50 points. And no
complaining for more food! The other day I complained and ate two whole
meals' worth and lost 100 points!"
Obviously this is brilliant tragicomedy in its own right, but think about
the implications here. Are the rules Guido is inventing any more ludicrous
than the idea of uncooperative prisoners being gassed to death in a shower?
If someone claimed this was happening in the United States as we speak,
wouldn't you laugh at them? Recently, while surfing the Internet, I came
across a web site which claimed that the Freemasons had built an elaborate
underground base under the Denver Airport where reptile aliens were using
abducted children as slave labor and then eating them when they became too
weak to continue working. Once I got past the initial shock at the horrific
imagery, I must admit my next reaction was to laugh. Not because I find the
idea of aliens eating children inherently humorous, of course, but because
it seemed funny that anyone could actually come up with such a ridiculous
idea in the first place. Is Nazism any more inherently farcical than this?
I don't think so. The only real difference is that, somehow, Nazism
actually happened, whereas (let's hope) this alien invasion is just a
paranoid fantasy. What Benigni has realized, I think, is that while it is
understandably a sensitive subject, it is no less deserving of mockery and
satire than these other examples of ideological lunacy. In fact, in one
scene, when Giosue has heard about the crematorium from other prisoners,
Guido convinces him they were lying simply by arguing that the story is too
crazy to be believed.
Part of the reason it seems so farcical, of course, is that it is so
difficult to imagine such abject and inhuman evil existing in a world that
most people take for granted as a basically decent place. Guido does what
he does mostly for the sake of his son, but we get the feeling that he
himself kind of wants to believe that this is all just some ridiculous
game. The only time that he comes face to face with one of the infamous
piles of skeletons that have become known to most of us through various
Holocaust documentaries, he and Giosue are wandering through a thick
nighttime fog, and he is mumbling to himself that perhpas it is all a
dream. This is also, I think, the purpose of the first hour of the film,
which in my opinion has been unfairly maligned by critics as being too
silly and slight in comparison to the Holocaust horrors that follow. It's
not just character development: it's also establishing the stark contrast
between the relatively pleasant (though increasingly restricted) life that
Guido's family led in comparison to the misery of the concentration camp.
We may find ourselves wondering how the film can shift so suddenly in tone,
and, by extension, how these things can all exist in the same world.
LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL doesn't quite earn four stars from me, mostly because I
had a little trouble actually accepting the premise, however
thought-provoking it may be. Little children may be gullible, but they can
still tell when they are surrounded by misery and suffering, and they would
not stay willingly in such a place regardless of what their parents may
tell them. Giosue protests that he doesn't want to play the game any more
at one point, but Guido manages to calm him down a little too easily.
Logically, I think he'd have reached a point where he would have insisted
that they stop regardless of the consequences or the possible rewards of
winning the game, and I certainly don't think he'd have made it through
more than a few days at the camp without crying or begging for his mother.
Nazism has been portrayed many times over in various art forms, usually
with an understandably grim seriousness. I can't recall anyone ever
addressing it with the bitter and viciously mocking satire that it receives
in LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL, however, and Benigni is to be praised for his
creative and intelligent approach to such a difficult subject.
Film Reviews Page:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Author
Cheng-Jih Chen

The afternoon before the Oscars, I finally got around to seeing "Life
is Beautiful".  I only caught a glimpse of Benigni's victorious
stepping on of Spielberg as he clampered over the seats; I was tired
and went to sleep early.
The movie has achieved a large share of acclaim, but there are also
many detractors who argue that this slapstick comedy partially set in
the Holocaust verges on Holocaust denial.  Among of the examples I've
seen include the New Yorker's film critic in two seperate articles,
because the first one was too short to contain his arguments; an NPR
piece that included commentary from Art Spiegelman, the author of Maus,
who takes it personally as Benigni appears to be using the Holocaust as
a metaphor, a corruption of Maus's use of using metaphor to approach
the Holocaust [1]; and Salon's reviewer [2].
I went into the film with this critical baggage.  This, of course,
colors the film in a certain way: one starts to look to see if the
movie confirms the criticisms.  I'm not sure how important this is, as
no film is seen in a vacuum of personal experience.
To summarize the basic plot (and get the obligatory bits of a review
over with), we should note that the movie starts as a light romantic
comedy.  Benigni plays a waiter, pursuing a woman he literally runs
into.  There are complications: she's engaged to the local Fascist
boss, who Benigni previous met in, well, let's say comic
circumstances.  Over the first hour of the film, Benigni's clown charms
her, wins her over.  Some years later, we find them their life together
happily settled, with a precocious son scampering around.  This idyll
is shattered when the Nazis come and the family is taken to a death
camp.
To keep his son alive, Benigni spins a story for him: the routines of
the camp are an elaborate game, and the winner gets a big tank as first
prize.  Elaborations are improvised: when the rest of the children
vanish, Benigni tells his son they are hiding, and that he should hide
too.  The charade continues until the end, when the war is over and the
Americans roll in to liberate the camp.
I actually found this to be a fine film, but weightless.  It makes a
statement about love and humor conquering all, but it is not a tested
proposition.  Yes, Benigni is still able to act as a clown to keep his
son alive and believing, but there was never any indication in the film
that he could not act as a clown.  There is little evidence in the film
that his character changes with circumstance, that he is not
compulsively the way he is.  There is then no doubt that love and humor
will conquer in this film: they simply exist and continue to exist,
unchallenged by any real despair or doubt.
It's in this nonexistence of despair that I see the point of the film's
detractors, and why they argue that it approaches Holocaust Denial
Lite, which asserts that while the Holocaust happened, it really wasn't
that bad.  Yes, there are unrealistic touches with the physical
presentation of the camp: it looks a whole lot like a summer camp, with
fairly roomy barracks for the inmates.  The guards have a touch of
Hogan's Heroes about them (the actor who plays the SS guard spelling
out the camp's rules, in fact, almost loses it and laughs out loud to
Benigni's antics).  Security is interestingly lax, as Benigni is able
to get to the camp loudspeaker for quite a long time without
interruption, as well as put a record player to good use in cheering up
his distant wife [3].  But more importantly, there's a lack of despair
or oppression, except for a few dramatically conducive moments.  In
some sense, the Holocaust isn't the Holocaust.  In this movie, the
Holocaust is merely a big bummer.
Interestingly, the one surreal moment of the film, when Benigni is
taking is son home from the Officer's mess, the dreamlike fog parts and
he sees a scene from a Breugel [4]: a mound of dessicated, naked
corpses, what remains after Death has conquered all.  Perhaps the
decision to make this sequence otherworldly is acknowledgement that
this ultimately light film cannot incorporate the reality of the death
camps within its frame.  It's in this sequence that the film comes
closest to breaking through its comic straightjacket, to shake off its
rictus of a smile.  We see a hint that the clown may well be confronted
by despair, but the hint doesn't last.
The film only works at one level, the simple one in which love,
compassion and humor can overcome the most dire of circumstances.  One
critic noted that "Life is Beautiful" could have become a great ironic
fable if the child was fully aware of what the camp was for, but was
playing along with the father to maintain his father's sanity and faith
that things will work out in the end.  But Benigni doesn't take this
path; it's unclear if you could have.  Another route may have been to
take seriously the notion that this film is a fable constructed from
the wartime memories of a six-year-old boy: the
death-camp-as-summer-camp is the world his father created for him,
hiding the reality.  Of course things were more pleasant; the loving
father has spun a necessary illusion.  But this is another road not
taken, and the film's message remains uncomplicated.
[1] http://www.npr.org/ramfiles/me/19990317.me.11.ram
[2] http://www.salonmagazine.com/ent/movies/reviews/1998/10/30reviewa.html
[3] There's a similar scene in "The Shawshank Redemption".  I think
it's in the Stephen King short story, but I don't remember.  I'm
curious about the precedents for the record player stunt.
[4] http://www.fhi-berlin.mpg.de/wm/paint/auth/bruegel/death.jpg

Author
Dennis Schwartz
LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL (director:Roberto Benigni; cast: Roberto Benigni
(Guido), Nicoletta Braschi (Dora), Giorgio Cantarini (Giosue), Giustino
Durano (Uncle), Sergio Bustric (Ferruccio), Horst Bucholz (Dr. Lessing),
1998-Italy)
There is no question that one has to be careful about the good taste
required when making a so-called comedy film about the Holocaust, not to
offend those who have suffered enough already, but that proves to be no
problem here, as Benigni went to some Jewish Organizations prior to
shooting the film and got their blessings for this project. Besides, I
don't think there are any sacred subjects that can't be touched, it is,
ultimately, the quality of the film itself that counts. And if there is
another reason for not disapproving offhand the film's comic handling of
this horrific context, then let's bring up the example of Charlie
Chaplin in the THE GREAT DICTATOR, though not directly about the
Holocaust, nevertheless, it was a light comedic parody of  "The
Fuehrer", and it was considered by many, not only to be an appropriate
film, but one of the all time great films.The later part of the
assessment of that film, is in recognition of that film's tremendous
power to satirize Nazism. Benigni's film just can't muster that same
power, because it has muddled and sanitized its telling of the story too
much, as well-intentioned, as he might have been in trying to tell the
story, the power in the telling of it is just not there.What is there,
are bits and pieces of the Holocaust's human story, that is as horrific
a story as any one can imagine, and offers some contribution to
understanding the affects of the Holocaust. What he just doesn't make
clear, is that the Italian Fascists were part of the "Final Solution."
They were not joking around about killing Jews. The proof is the large
number of Italian Jews who were killed in the Holocaust. Benigni's film
offers no explanation for this. A much better and truer film than his,
that unfailingly tells about the Italian culpability in the Holocaust,
is THE GARDEN of the FINZI-CONTINIS (1971), which didn't waste the
audience's time trying to amuse them with childish antics, instead
stayed true to what was happening to the Jewish families in Italy.
LIFE IS BEAUTIFUL, is the line Trotsky said, before he was about to be
assassinated, serves as the rosy title for such a downbeat subject, that
is played in a hearfelt and sincere manner, even though, what it offers
for Nazi atrocities is for the most part the mildly anti-septic kind,
reminding me of  STALAG 17, or HOGAN'S HEROES TV series where the Nazis
are pictured as cartoon buffoons.
Having a horse painted green, marked as a Jewish horse, makes for a
colorful scene and segue to elopement for Guido (Benigni) and Dora
(Braschi), but in no way begins to symbolize or explore the deep rooted
hatred that would lead to a policy of genocide. To find such truths, go
way beyond the scope of this comedy star vehicle, which, instead, uses
this serious subject matter for Benigni to contrast his Charlie Chaplin
like routines with the threat of genocide that is ominous, while
following a story line that will not try to offend anyone, probably not
even the Nazis, that much, especially since Benigni calls this story a
fable, giving him an excuse to invent what he wants for the film. Let me
tell you, the Holocaust was no fable. But yet, because the subject
matter is so deadly serious, he is, at least, able to reach a more
general audience, drawn to see such a film they would have most likely
not seen, but see it because of Benigni's comic ability, and in the
process, he has vouchsafed for them how insane the world's prejudice
against Jews has been, as he makes the film's efforts seem worthy
enough, even if that were all this film would accomplish, that would be
plenty. But I believe he does accomplish more, but he does it,  by
distorting history, until, in the end, he does show the horror and
tragedy of the Holocaust, in his own inimical way.
In the first part of the film, if you did not know that Benigni's Guido
was Jewish, you certainly couldn't tell, since he just seemed like he
was an eccentric, motor-mouth Italian. So, in that sense, this film in a
round-about way, is erasing that stereotyped prejudice some people might
still have about Jews being so different from others.
I was not offended by seeing comedy routines take place in a
concentration camp; I also was not touched as I should have been with
the gravity of the situation, due to the comic effects. And if any one
in their right mind thought that by playing some silly child game in a
concentration camp they could survive, I got a surprise for them, it
ain't so.
The book that gave me a very truthful and precisely frank look at the
daily lives of those in such predicaments, is the one by the Italian
chemist and former concentration survivor, Primo Levi, whose
autobiographical, "I Survived Auschwitz," shows what it really was like
in those camps.That book touched me, even more than the truest film to
date that I saw about the Holocaust, SHOAH, did. After you read that
book, there can be no illusions that you are in for a game in the park
when you are interred in such a camp. Though the Italian Jews had it
easier than the others brought to the camp, because they came there
pretty near the end of the war and therefore were not subjected to long
torturous years of suffering, nevertheless, it was a place where the
survivors looked like skeletons and felt as if they were already dead.
The film is really made up of two parts, each with a very different feel
to it. The first part consists of lushly created cinematography, as it
tells of the clownish, hyper antics of Guido, as he is an Italian
country boy, coming to the Tuscan city in a brakeless car, where he is
mistaken for the Italian king as he whizzes by a crowd awaiting the
king, holding his arm out accidently in a Nazi salute to keep the crowd
away, this is in 1939. For most of this part of the film we don't even
know if he is Jewish, until we see the green horse and, later on, see
the sign on his bookstore saying this is a Jewish place, since he seems
to be in some denial mode of what is really going on around him.
Amid a whole bag full of slapstick jokes, which probably never go out of
style, since the audience where I watched the film, howled with
uncontrollable laughter at all the corny bits, leaving me to wonder why
I can't muster a laugh. There must be something funny about this
physical humor, after all, there is a long line of vaudeville  comedians
who made people laugh for generations doing those schticks. I guess,
this kind of comedy is just not my cup of tea, and if others find it
funny and because of it, find the film endearing, then it is just a
question of differing tastes. Though, quite frankly, I did think most of
the bits were embarrassingly crass; for instance, those contrived scenes
where he keeps bumping into his future wife, and the switching of hats;
and, the egg- in- the- face routine, I found to be especially tedious,
since I find him to be more energetic and a master of good timing than
outright funny. But, I also, must say, the first part of the film was
easy to watch, it seemed to have a smooth and even flow to it.
Guido immediately finds romance with the wealthy school teacher, Dora,
(who is his real-life wife). It's too bad she can't act, but then again,
this is basically a one man show, so really, she just becomes another
one of his props, much like a leading lady in a Marx Bros. movie is
used, as a diversion to balance their comedy routines. Guido's romance
is complicated by Dora's engagement to a local Fascist bureaucrat, which
gives Guido a chance to pull every string in our hearts, as he goes
about winning her love from the typical comedy film foil, her
buffoonlike Fascist lover plays. This material is shamelessly old hat,
it is only effusive because the star is so frenetic and nimble and
manipulative on screen. But there were also some clever bits, like his
speech, though not original, it still hit the mark, as he pretended to
be a school official, giving a talk on racial superiority to elementary
students where Dora teaches, using his body as an example of all his
superior Fascist parts, such as his belly button, which is a good
Fascist one. Guido does this, while working for his uncle as a waiter.
When the scene changes from the greenhouse he enters with Dora after
their elopement, and it is now 1945 and he is happily married to her,
the tragedy of their situation finally hits home, and part two of the
film turns grim, as the loving father of a five-year-old, is arrested by
the Fascists and along with his son, is taken cattle-style by train to
the camp. His wife who is not Jewish, is not arrested, but she insists
on going to the camp with them. In order for the father to allay the
child's fears, he says it's all a game and who ever scores 1,000 points
will win a tank, a real one. This prize is valuable to the kid whose
favorite possession at home is his toy tank. This game idea could
probably work for as long as a train ride from Italy to Germany, but for
anyone to think it could work inside the camp, that would be ludicrous
on their part to think so. The camp they were in, seemed more as if it
were a coal mine then a death camp, and Guido was stuck with a bad coal
miner's job, with really rotten bosses and working conditions. The Jews
in the camp looked so well fed, that it was hard to believe that they
were in a concentration camp.
The kid was perky and wide-eyed and intelligently precocious, just right
for the part, and the only other person who caught my attention in a
multi-dimensional performance, where you could at least find some
variable expressions on their face, was Horst Bucholz, as a Nazi doctor,
who was waited on by Guido in his uncle's restaurant and is now a doctor
in the camp, insensitive to Guido's new position in life, but still
showed enough cognition for him to save his life by making him a waiter
in the camp. Everyone else said their lines in a flat monotone voice
that projected bad acting and because of that, almost made a mockery out
of their roles. Naturally the comedy routines did not work inside the
camp, except for the bit where Guido translates the rules of the camp
for the German guards, as he makes it seem to the kid that what he is
reading are the rules for the game they are playing, as he explains that
the guards are only acting mean because they are part of the game. No
one laughed in the audience, but this was funny in a way that you
wouldn't laugh out loud funny. Some slapstick was tried, such as Guido's
comically high stepping walk, but that got no laughs. But mostly, for
this part of the film, the emphasis became on this game he was playing
for his kid's sake, his love was so great for him, that he would do
anything to save his life. Audiences could relate to that, and that
cleverly became the focal and selling point of the film. That is
primarily why this film won an Oscar for best foreign film, its comedy
alone would not have been enough.
The film, to its ever lasting credit, was able to clearly depict Jews as
human beings, not as objects to be reduced to soap or buttons, more
human than the Nazis, who have disqualified themselves from being a
civilized regime by their inhumanity.This leaves the masterminds of
racial superiority with their own absurd philosophies of intolerance.
Where I think LIFE IS BEAUTFUL succeeded most, is being a film that
inadvertly, without probably really being fully aware of what it was
doing, showed how unprepared the Jews were for this tragedy by being in
a state of denial. After the Holocaust, the rallying motto of the
surviving Jews was "Never Again." And what they learned from this event
in history, is to be vigilant and not be in a state of denial about
prejudice ever again. Which is one of the reasons why the Holocaust is
such a touchy subject, and one has to be careful about how one presents
it to others, lest one forgets its dire consequences. And as
unbelievable as it may seem, LIFE IS BEAUTFUL, somehow or other, caught
an interesting aspect of the Holocaust, with an original take on how
passive the Jews were, something few films really make a major point of,
for one reason or another. Most Italian Jews stayed put in their home
country until the moment was too late for them to leave, never believing
that the absurd philosophy of the Nazis could be taken seriously. Guido,
at this time, is in the bourgeoisie social strata, being a bookseller,
not wanting to give up on his country; while, at the same time frame,
Primo Levi, was an Italian resistance fighter, captured and sent to the
camp.
Did the film do enough to show the horrors of genocide ? For some people
it evidently did enough to leave them beguiled by the improbable mix of
comedy and a Holocaust. The uniqueness and likability of this film, is
that Benigni exploits his comic talents to take advantage of a very
difficult situation, using comedy as a weapon. But this is most
definetly an example of the rewriting of history, by seeing the
Holocaust as if it could almost be perceived as comical and not quite
real, as a fable, depending on the audience itself to know fully well
what happened, where only by the very end of the film, is there a
realization that something terrible has happened and a tear could be
shed, does a disservice to how history and the victims of it look at it
and fails to recognize how little people not directly involved with the
Holocaust actually know about it.
There is a reason why films are popular, and that reason is that people
want to see what they like on screen, they as a rule, do not like to
think about things that are unpleasant to them, and this film has deftly
and arbitrarily accomplished that by skimming the surface off all the
horrible things they could have seen, instead, it subtly goes about its
business by hiding from the audience what really happened to the Jews in
those camps by not showing how real their plight was.This film seemed
almost like it was primarily a very personal film about a father's love
for his family and his great sacrifice for them, rather than a Holocaust
film per se.
That the world is still filled with hatred, filled with other genocide
campaigns, and not filled with enough people throughout the world with
enough courage to put a stop to this attitude, is as plain as day. I
still think that most of the world is at a low stage of the evolutionary
scale and ready to do a Nazi-style thing all over, if given the chance,
just check out the recent Serbian-Kosovo conflict for affirmation that
ethnic cleansing has not gone away with the end of Nazism.
So what can a film do ? Probably, all it can do is show what really
happened, and it doesn't matter if its method is drama, comedy, or even
a musical, as long as it is meaningful. I intend to be very critically
tolerant of this film and say, that even though it struck me as a rather
thin Holocaust story, it is still a worthwhile film for those who don't
want or can't handle the heavier stuff, and are not put off by the
comedy. They will find, if they look hard enough and look past what
Miramax promoted for its own purposes so it could win the Oscar, a film
that is more complex than it appears at first glance. But they will also
find, that it is a film that still makes it evident, that the world
still is in denial of what really happened, and can only look at the
Holocaust in a rather superficial way, even after all these years. There
is still an element of world guilt, that because of that, will so highly
reward this film with honors, even if the film has shown that it cannot
open up both its eyes to see how real the Holocaust was. But, I guess,
we should thank Benigni for at least opening up one eye, and letting us
see that both his film's take on the Holocaust and most of the world's
take on the Holocaust, is still bonded by denial about how they view the
Holocaust, which is the same mistake the Italian Jews made when they
denied the obvious, what was right in front of their noses, until it was
too late.
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ
